Illinois, session 104th, SB20.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Hemp 5Consumer Products Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Accreditation body" means an impartial non-profit 8organization that operates in conformance with the 9International Organization for Standardization 10(ISO)/International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC) 11standard 17011 and is a signatory to the International 12Laboratory Accreditation Cooperation (ILAC) Mutual Recognition 13Arrangement (MRA) for Testing.14    "Artificially derived cannabinoid" means a cannabinoid 15that is created by a chemical or physical reaction that 16changes the molecular structure of any chemical substance 17derived from Cannabis sativa.18    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.19    "Director" means the Director of Agriculture.20    "Hemp cannabinoid" means a naturally occurring 21phytocannabinoid derived from the hemp plant that does not 22have an intoxicating effect on the mind and body, as 23determined by the Department by rule, including:  SB0020- 2 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        (1) cannabidiol (CBD);2        (2) cannabichromene (CBC);3        (3) cannabicitran (CBT);4        (4) cannabicyclol (CBL);5        (5) cannabielsoin (CBE);6        (6) cannabigerol (CBG);7        (7) cannabidivarin (CBDV); or8        (8) cannabinol (CBN).9    "Hemp consumer CBD product" means a product offered for 10sale or distribution that:11        (1) contains naturally occurring hemp 12    phytocannabinoids;13        (2) is intended for consumption by any means, 14    including, but not limited to, oral ingestion, inhalation, 15    smoking, or topical absorption;16        (3) contains a total tetrahydrocannabinol 17    concentration of no greater than:18            (a) 0.3%; or19            (b) 0.5 milligrams per serving or individual 20        product unit, and 2 milligrams per package for 21        products sold in multiple servings or units, for any 22        beverage, food, oil, ointment, tincture, topical 23        formation, or any other product that is intended for 24        human or animal consumption by means other than 25        inhalation or smoking; and26        (4) contains a total hemp cannabinoid concentration   SB0020- 3 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    that is at least 25 times greater than the total 2    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration per serving and per 3    package.4    "Hemp consumer CBD product registrant" means a person or 5entity that manufactures, processes, packages, handles, 6distributes or otherwise adds value to the hemp consumer CBD 7product, and made the first sale of the hemp consumer CBD 8product in Illinois to an Illinois wholesaler, processor, 9distributor, retailer, or consumer, or as otherwise defined by 10rule. A hemp consumer CBD product registrant is required to 11register hemp consumer CBD products with the Department of 12Agriculture prior to sale of hemp consumer CBD products in 13Illinois.14    "Hemp consumer products manufacturer" means a person or 15entity located in Illinois licensed to source industrial hemp 16plant material from a licensed state, tribal, or USDA hemp 17cultivator, and process, manufacture, and distribute hemp 18products for human or animal consumption.19    "Hemp-derived intoxicating product" means a beverage, 20food, oil, ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or other 21product intended for human or animal consumption that is 22derived from hemp extract and does not contain more than 5 23milligrams per serving or 10 milligrams per package of delta-9 24THC derived from any naturally occurring cannabinoids found in 25hemp and that may only be offered for sale at a dispensing 26organization under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.  SB0020- 4 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    "Scope of accreditation" means a document issued by an 2accreditation body that attests to a testing laboratory's 3competence to carry out specific testing and analysis.4    "Synthetic cannabinoid" means a cannabinoid-like compound 5that was produced using chemical synthesis, chemical 6modification, or chemical conversion, including in vitro 7biosynthesis or other bioconversion methods. "Synthetic 8cannabinoid" includes cannabinoids converted from one chemical 9structure into another, such as tetrahydrocannabinol produced 10by the conversion of cannabidiol.11    "Testing laboratory" means an independent, third-party 12laboratory approved and registered with the Department that is 13contracted to test hemp consumer CBD products. A testing 14laboratory may include laboratories approved by the Department 15under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or a laboratory 16operated by the State.17    "Tetrahydrocannabinol" or "THC" means any naturally 18occurring or synthetic tetrahydrocannabinol, including its 19salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence 20of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible 21within the specific chemical designation, and any preparation, 22mixture, or substance containing, or mixed or infused with, 23any detectable amount of tetrahydrocannabinol or 24tetrahydrocannabolic acid, including, but not limited to, 25delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, 26delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabolic acid,   SB0020- 5 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1tetrahydrocannabiphorol, or hexahydrocannabinol, however 2derived, or any other substance determined by the Department 3to have similar intoxicating effects on the mind or body. As 4used in this definition, "isomer" means the optical, position, 5and geometric isomers. 6    Section 10. Prohibitions; compliance. 7    (a) Beginning on the effective date of this Act, no 8person, retailer, or entity shall distribute for sale, 9manufacture, sell, offer for sale, market, or advertise any 10hemp product intended for human or animal consumption within 11this State unless the hemp product meets the definition of 12hemp consumer CBD product, is sold by a licensed cannabis 13business establishment under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 14Act or Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Act, or is sold to 15or purchased by an industrial hemp processor or hemp consumer 16product manufacturer licensee for use in the manufacture of 17hemp products intended for human or animal consumption.18    (b) Effective January 1, 2026 or upon the first date that a 19hemp consumer CBD product registration application is made 20available by the Department, whichever is sooner, all hemp 21consumer CBD products shall comply with all of the hemp 22consumer CBD product requirements of this Act.23    (c) A product that has a THC concentration greater than 24the limits set forth for hemp consumer CBD products as defined 25in this Act shall, unless otherwise provided under this Act,   SB0020- 6 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1be regulated as cannabis as defined in the Cannabis Regulation 2and Tax Act, whether or not the product is made with or derived 3from hemp or industrial hemp or is derived from natural or 4synthetic sources.5    (d) A product derived from hemp cannabinoids and sold by a 6cannabis business establishment as authorized by the Cannabis 7Regulation and Tax Act shall be cannabis as that term is used 8under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act and may be sold only 9by a licensed dispensing organization.10    (e) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (c), until January 1120, 2026 any beverage derived from hemp may be offered for sale 12or sold by (i) a person licensed under the Liquor Control Act 13as a retailer or a manufacturer that has retail privileges 14whose total sales of alcohol equal 90% or more of total sales 15or (ii) an industrial hemp manufacturer or hemp consumer 16product manufacturer who also holds retail privileges as a 17manufacturer as provided under the Liquor Control Act. No 18beverage derived from hemp may be given, sold, transferred, or 19delivered, with or without remuneration, to any person under 2021 years of age. A retailer subject to this subsection (e) 21shall refuse to sell any beverage derived from hemp to any 22person unless the person produces valid identification showing 23that the person is 21 years of age or older, which must be 24verified at the point of sale. Any hemp-derived beverages 25subject to this subsection (e) may contain only up to 10 26milligrams per individual container of   SB0020- 7 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol derived from any naturally 2occurring cannabinoids found in hemp. 3    (f) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the transportation 4or shipment of hemp or hemp products through the State.  5    Section 15. Hemp consumer product manufacturers; 6applications and licensing. 7    (a) By January 1, 2026, the Department shall create 8applicable rules, guidance, and forms for licensing hemp 9consumer products manufacturers and a process to transition 10industrial hemp manufacturers registered under the Industrial 11Hemp Act that processes or manufactures products derived from 12hemp intended for human or animal consumption to a hemp 13consumer product license.14    (b) An application for licensure shall be submitted to the 15Department on a form prescribed by the Department, which shall 16include:17        (1) the name, address, email address, and telephone 18    number of the applicant;19        (2) identification of the facility that will be used 20    for the processing, manufacturing, distribution, or retail 21    sale of hemp, as applicable;22        (3) a copy of the current local zoning ordinance or 23    permit and verification that the proposed hemp consumer 24    products processor is in compliance with the local zoning 25    rules and distance limitations established by the local   SB0020- 8 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    jurisdiction for hemp consumer products processing; 2        (4) the federal employer identification number of the 3    applicant;4        (5) a copy and description of any other license or 5    licenses issued by state or federal authorities related to 6    hemp or cannabis operations or ancillary services;7        (6) a summary of the sources of industrial processes, 8    hemp materials, hemp consumer CBD products, and hemp 9    extract to be used, as applicable;10        (7) a description of any other businesses or business 11    activities conducted on the premises to be licensed;12        (8) identification of the person or persons with the 13    ability to direct the activity of the applicant or 14    licensee, including principals, officers, or others with 15    such control; and16        (9) any other information required by the Department.17    (c) The Department may reject or deny an application if it 18determines that the information contained in the application 19does not meet the requirements or is incomplete, false, 20inaccurate, or omits a material fact.21    (d) Licenses shall not be transferable or assignable to 22any person, including, without limitation, to another 23licensee, without prior written approval of the Department.24    (e) Licenses are valid for a period of one year and must be 25renewed annually at a fee of $5,000 or as otherwise determined 26by rule.  SB0020- 9 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (f) The Department may revoke any license issued under 2this Act for failure to adhere to the requirements of this Act 3and the rules adopted by the Department. 4    Section 20. Requirements for hemp consumer products 5manufacturer licensees. 6    (a) The Department shall license and regulate hemp 7consumer products manufacturers for the purpose of allowing 8processors to obtain and source lawful industrial hemp and 9hemp plant materials for manufacturing and processing finished 10hemp consumer products in accordance with this Act.11    (b) All hemp consumer products manufacturers shall:12        (1) maintain sufficient records to demonstrate that 13    any hemp or hemp extract used by the licensee was grown, 14    derived, extracted, and transported in accordance with 15    applicable laws and licensing requirements of the 16    jurisdiction or jurisdictions from which the hemp or hemp 17    extract was sourced and, for hemp received from an 18    out-of-state grower, shall also maintain records of the 19    out-of-state grower registration or license number in the 20    respective jurisdiction;21        (4) keep all designated extracting and manufacturing 22    areas safe and sanitary, including, but not limited to, 23    ensuring that those areas are adequately lit, cleaned, and 24    smoke-free;25        (5) not use, in the extraction or manufacturing of any   SB0020- 10 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    hemp consumer CBD products, synthetic cannabinoids, 2    artificially derived cannabinoids, or 3    tetrahydrocannabinol created through isomerization; and4        (6) maintain the records required by this Act for at 5    least 3 years and immediately produce those records upon 6    request of the Department.7    (c) A hemp product manufacturer shall not offer for sale 8or distribution products to a location where prohibited by law 9or to a business that is not permitted to sell products made by 10the licensee.11    (d) The Department may conduct announced or unannounced 12premises or product inspections, including, but not limited 13to, inspections, audits, sampling, and testing of hemp, hemp 14extract, hemp consumer CBD products, or any solvents, 15chemicals, or materials used by the licensee.16    (e) A hemp consumer product manufacturer shall comply with 17any other requirements or prohibitions set by administrative 18rule by the Department. 19    Section 25. Registration of hemp consumer CBD products. 20    (a) Upon the availability of a hemp consumer CBD product 21registration application, all establishments, including 22physical and online establishments, shall register all hemp 23consumer CBD products offered for sale in the State with the 24Department. Hemp consumer CBD products must comply with 25registration requirements under this Act.  SB0020- 11 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (b) The Department shall create an online hemp consumer 2CBD product registration application. The Department may 3reject an application if the product hemp consumer CBD product 4does not meet the definition of a hemp consumer CBD product or 5does not meet any other hemp consumer CBD product requirements 6under this Act or under rules adopted under this Act.7    (c) The product registration application shall include, 8but is not limited to:9        (1) the name of the hemp consumer CBD product;10        (2) a recently conducted certificate of analysis; and 11        (3) a depiction of the label on the hemp consumer CBD 12    product.13    (d) The Department shall maintain a list of registered 14hemp consumer CBD products on its website.15    (e) A new registration shall be submitted if there is a 16change to the name, label, recipe, or chemical composition of 17the hemp consumer CBD product.18    (f) Any registered hemp consumer CBD product offered for 19sale in the State may be subject to product inspection and 20sampling by the Department to ensure compliance with the 21registration requirements. Any retailer of a hemp consumer CBD 22product shall provide the Department with a reasonable sample 23upon request not to exceed 2 units per product type.24    (g) The Department may deregister any registered hemp 25consumer CBD product that is found not to be in compliance with 26the Act. The Department shall maintain a list of hemp consumer   SB0020- 12 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1CBD products that have been deregistered on its website. 2Retail establishments shall have 30 days to remove from sale 3all hemp consumer CBD products that have been deregistered.4    (h) The Department may prohibit a hemp consumer CBD 5product registrant from registering hemp consumer CBD products 6if the registrant has had 3 hemp consumer CBD products 7deregistered in a one-year period, or as otherwise provided 8for by rule.9    (i) The Department shall set and collect a fee of $150 for 10the registration of each hemp consumer CBD product, which 11shall be deposited into the Industrial Hemp Regulatory Fund. 12The Department may adjust the fee by rule. 13    (j) The Department may adopt rules regarding the 14registration of hemp consumer CBD products.15    (k) Retailers or entities that offer for sale products 16that are found to meet the definition of a hemp consumer CBD 17product but are not registered are subject to a $500 fine per 18product.  19    Section 30. Requirements of hemp consumer CBD products.20    (a) All hemp consumer CBD products distributed, sold, or 21offered for sale in this State shall be subject to the 22following minimum requirements:23        (1) the hemp consumer CBD product shall:24            (A) contain naturally occurring hemp 25        phytocannabinoids;  SB0020- 13 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1            (B) be intended for consumption by any means, 2        including, but not limited to, oral ingestion, 3        inhalation, smoking, or topical absorption;4            (C) contain a total tetrahydrocannabinol 5        concentration of no greater than:6                (i) 0.3%; or7                (ii) 0.5 milligrams per serving or individual 8            product unit, and 2 milligrams per package for 9            products sold in multiple servings or units, for 10            any beverage, food, oil, ointment, tincture, 11            topical formation, or any other product that is 12            intended for human or animal consumption by means 13            other than inhalation or smoking; 14            (D) have total hemp cannabinoid concentration that 15        is at least 25 times greater than the amount of total 16        tetrahydrocannabinol concentration per serving and per 17        package;18        (2) not contain liquor, wine, beer, or cider or meet 19    the definition of alcoholic liquor under the Liquor 20    Control Act of 1934;21        (3) not contain tobacco or nicotine in the product;22        (4) accurately reflect testing results and not contain 23    less than 90% or more than 110% of the concentration of 24    total cannabinoid content as listed on the product label;25        (5) be prepackaged and not added to food or any other 26    consumable products at the point of sale;  SB0020- 14 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        (6) comply with product testing standards set forth in 2    this Act; and 3        (7) not contain synthetic cannabinoids or artificially 4    derived cannabinoids.5    (b) All concentrated hemp consumer CBD products intended 6for inhalation or vaporization shall meet the following 7additional requirements:8        (1) except for hemp-derived terpenes, excipients and 9    ingredients must be pharmaceutical grade, unless otherwise 10    approved by the Department, and shall not include:11            (A) synthetic terpenes; 12            (B) polyethylene glycol (PEG); 13            (C) vitamin E acetate; 14            (D) medium chain triglycerides (MCT oil); 15            (E) medicinal compounds; 16            (F) illegal or controlled substances; 17            (G) artificial food coloring; 18            (H) benzoic acid; 19            (I) diketones; or 20            (J) any other compound or ingredient as determined 21        by the Department in rules; and22        (2) excipients and ingredients must not contain any 23    flavors or flavoring agents, except for hemp-derived 24    terpenes.  25    Section 35. Packaging and labeling of hemp consumer CBD   SB0020- 15 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1products. 2    (a) All hemp consumer CBD products distributed or offered 3for retail sale in this State shall include the following 4information on the product label or packaging:5        (1) a list of all ingredients in descending order of 6    predominance by weight in the product;7        (2) The serving size and number of servings per 8    package or container, including the milligrams per serving 9    of detectable:10            (A) individual hemp cannabinoids;11            (B) total hemp cannabinoids;12            (C) individual THC cannabinoids;13            (D) total THC; and14            (E) any other cannabinoids;15        (3) an expiration date;16        (4) the name of the hemp manufacturer, whether 17    in-state or out-of-state;18        (5) a means for reporting serious adverse events; and19        (6) any other marking, statement, or symbol required 20    by the Department, by rule.21    (b) No hemp consumer CBD product offered for retail sale 22shall be made attractive to children; imitate a candy label or 23widely available food label; use fruit, cartoons, or other 24images popularly used to advertise to children; or otherwise 25be marketed to children.26    (c) No hemp consumer CBD product shall be marketed,   SB0020- 16 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1advertised, or offered for sale in a manner that would cause a 2reasonable consumer:3        (1) to be confused as to whether the hemp consumer CBD 4    product is trademarked, marked, or labeled in a manner 5    that violates any federal trademark law or regulation; or6        (2) to believe that a hemp consumer CBD product is 7    cannabis, or medical cannabis, or that a licensee is 8    authorized to sell or dispense cannabis or medical 9    cannabis, as those terms are defined in the Cannabis 10    Regulation and Tax Act or the Compassionate Use of Medical 11    Cannabis Program Act.12    (d) All hemp consumer CBD products offered for retail sale 13shall include the following warnings on the product label or 14packaging, in a manner that is clear and conspicuous:15        (1) a warning that the product must be kept out of the 16    reach of children and pets;17        (2) a warning that the product has not been evaluated 18    or approved by the Food and Drug Administration for safety 19    or efficacy;20        (3) a warning that a pregnant or nursing consumer 21    should consult the consumer's health care provider before 22    use; 23        (4) for hemp consumer CBD products intended to be 24    inhaled or vaporized, a warning stating that smoking or 25    vaping is hazardous to your health; and 26        (5) any other warning required by the Department.   SB0020- 17 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Section 40. Laboratory testing requirements for hemp 2consumer CBD products. 3    (a) The Department shall approve hemp consumer CBD product 4testing laboratories to be contracted by licensees under this 5Act for testing of hemp consumer CBD products. All approved 6testing laboratories shall be listed on the Department's 7website. Out-of-state laboratories may be approved by the 8Department.9    (b) All approved testing laboratories shall maintain:10        (1) ISO/IEC 17025 accreditation for the physical 11    testing location and for the testing of one or more of the 12    analytes determined by the department;13        (2) a valid scope of accreditation, issued by an 14    accreditation body, that attests to the laboratory's 15    competence to perform testing of hemp consumer CBD 16    products;17        (3) method validation records for all testing 18    conducted;19        (4) standard operating procedures for the sampling of 20    hemp consumer CBD products; and21        (5) maintain testing methodologies to ascertain the 22    presence of synthetic cannabinoids, artificially derived 23    cannabinoids, or cannabinoids created through 24    isomerization, including tetrahydrocannabinol created 25    through isomerization.  SB0020- 18 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (c) Hemp cannabinoid products shall not be sold within 2this State if hemp cannabinoid, THC, or other contaminants are 3detected at levels greater than provided for by this Act or 4rules or guidance adopted by the Department. 5    (d) Hemp cannabinoid products shall be considered 6adulterated and shall not be sold within this State if there is 7the presence of synthetic cannabinoids, artificially derived 8cannabinoids, or cannabinoids created through isomerization, 9including tetrahydrocannabinol created through isomerization.10    (e) The Department may impose additional testing 11requirements, including, but not limited to, testing for 12additional analytes, setting stricter analyte, and mandating 13the use of specific sampling methodologies per lot, analyte 14per process, or batch manufactured. 15    (f) The Department shall make available a list of required 16analytes, their acceptable limits, and approved testing 17methods on the Department's website and in any other manner as 18determined by the Department.19    (g) The total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration for hemp 20consumer CBD products shall not exceed the limits established 21in this Act.22    (h) If a hemp consumer CBD product fails testing, the 23processor may elect to reformulate the failing batch to reduce 24the total tetrahydrocannabinol of the batch to comply with the 25THC limits established by this Act. If the reformulated batch 26still exceeds the THC limits, the processor shall destroy the   SB0020- 19 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1batch. 2    (i) If a hemp consumer CBD product is found to contain 3levels of any pathogen, toxicant, residual solvent, metal, or 4pesticide not enumerated in this Section or by other State 5law, then the product may not be sold in this State. 6    Section 45. Advertising requirements. An advertisement for 7a hemp consumer CBD product shall not:8        (1) include any false or misleading statements, 9    images, or other content, including, but not limited to, 10    any health claims;11        (2) contain claims that hemp consumption or a hemp 12    consumer CBD product can, or is intended to, diagnose, 13    cure, mitigate, treat, or prevent disease;14        (3) lead a reasonable consumer to believe that a hemp 15    consumer CBD product is cannabis or medical cannabis, 16    including any product that exceeds the THC limits 17    established under this Act for lawful hemp consumer CBD 18    products, or that a licensee is authorized to sell or 19    dispense cannabis or medical cannabis; or20        (4) have the purpose or effect of targeting or being 21    attractive to individuals under 21 years of age. The use 22    of images of children or minors consuming hemp consumer 23    CBD products and the use of words, designs, or brands that 24    resemble products commonly associated with children, 25    minors, or marketed to children or minors, is prohibited.    SB0020- 20 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Section 50. Sale of hemp-derived products to cannabis 2business establishments.3    (a) A hemp product manufacturer may sell final 4hemp-derived intoxicating products to a craft grower and 5infuser organization licensed under the Cannabis Regulation 6and Tax Act to be sold as a cannabis-infused product to a 7dispensing organization.8    (b) A hemp-derived intoxicating product may contain up to 95 milligrams per serving and 10 milligrams per package of 10delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol. A hemp-derived intoxicating 11product may not contain any other form of THC except 12delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol. 13    (c) A hemp-derived intoxicating product received by a 14craft grower or infuser must comply with all requirements of 15the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act before sale to a 16dispensing organization. 17    (d) The sale of hemp-derived intoxicating product to 18cannabis business establishments shall be subject to any 19requirements and prohibitions set by administrative rule by 20the Department.21    (e) A hemp-derived intoxicating product, in addition to 22meeting any label requirement of the Cannabis Regulation and 23Tax Act, must indicate on the label that the product was 24derived from hemp.   SB0020- 21 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Section 55. License suspension; revocation; other 2penalties.3    (a) Notwithstanding any other criminal penalties related 4to the unlawful possession of cannabis, the Department may 5revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, issue cease 6and desist orders, refuse to issue or renew a license, or take 7any other disciplinary or nondisciplinary action as the 8Department may deem proper with regard to a hemp consumer 9product manufacturer, including fines not to exceed $15,000 10for each violation of this Act or rules adopted under this Act.11    (b) The Department shall consider licensee cooperation in 12any agency or other investigation in its determination of 13penalties imposed under this Section.14    (c) The procedures for disciplining a hemp consumer 15product manufacturer and for administrative hearings shall be 16determined by rule, and shall provide for the review of final 17decisions under the Administrative Review Law. 18    Section 60. Administration and enforcement; rules; 19inspections. 20    (a) The Department shall administer and enforce this Act 21and may adopt rules under the Illinois Administrative 22Procedure Act for the purpose of administering and enforcing 23this Act.24    (b) The Department shall update, through official guidance 25and publish publicly on its website, the cannabinoids that it   SB0020- 22 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1deems tetrahydrocannabinol or THC on or before January 1 and 2July 1 of each calendar year.3    (c) The Department may develop rules setting forth 4labeling, packaging, and minimum testing requirements of 5cannabinoid products.6    (d) The Department of Public Health, local health 7departments, the Illinois State Police, local sheriff's 8departments, municipal police departments, and the Department 9of Revenue may inspect any business that manufactures, 10processes, or offers for sale cannabinoid products in the 11State if a formal complaint is registered with the appropriate 12agency in order to ensure compliance with this Act. The 13Department may inspect any business that manufactures, 14processes, or offers for sale cannabinoid products in the 15State to ensure compliance with this Act. The Department may 16enter into intergovernmental agreements to enforce this Act 17and any rules adopted under this Act. 18    Section 70. Temporary restraining order or injunction. The 19Director, through the Attorney General or any unit of local 20government, may file a complaint and apply to the circuit 21court for, and the court upon hearing and for cause shown may 22grant, a temporary restraining order or a preliminary or 23permanent injunction restraining any person from violating 24this Act.   SB0020- 23 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Section 805. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 2changing Section 1-10 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)4    Sec. 1-10. Application. 5    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 6bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 7first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 8be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 9provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 10prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 11Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 12entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 13instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 14solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 15July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 16Code and its intent.17    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 18funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 19assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:20        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 21    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 22    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 23    this Code.24        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 25    Section 20-80.  SB0020- 24 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 2    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.3        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 4    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 5    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 6    that individual.7        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.8        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 9    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 10    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 11    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 12    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 13    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 14    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 15    contract.16        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 17    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 18    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 19    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 20    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 21    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 22    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 23    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 24    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.25        (8) (Blank).26        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois   SB0020- 25 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.2        (10) (Blank). 3        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 4    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 5    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 6    design-build agreements entered into according to the 7    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 8    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.9        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 10    professional and artistic services entered into by the 11    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 12    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 13    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 14    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 15    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 16    as well as the final approval by the members of the 17    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.18        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 19    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 20    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 21    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 22    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 23    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 24    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 25    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 26    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority   SB0020- 26 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    of the terms of the contract. 2        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 3    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 4    science services in consultation with and subject to the 5    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 6    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 7    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 8    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 9    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 10    writing with justification, waive any certification 11    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 12    for services which are currently provided by members of a 13    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 14    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 15    subcontracting shall be followed.16        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 17    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 18        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 19    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 20    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.21        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 22    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 23    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 24    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 25    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 26    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations,   SB0020- 27 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 2    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 3    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 4    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 5    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 6    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 7    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 8    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 9    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 10    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 11    water or waste water systems with 10,000 connections or 12    less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 21-201 of the 13    Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities owning or 14    operating utility systems consisting of public utilities 15    as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of the 16    Illinois Municipal Code. 17        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 18    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 19    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 20    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 21        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 22    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 23    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 24    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 25    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 26    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access   SB0020- 28 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 2    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 3    Medical Cannabis Program Act.4        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 5    necessary for the Department of Agriculture or , the 6    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 7    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 8    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 9    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act 10    and for the Department of Agriculture to implement the 11    Hemp Consumer Products Act, if the applicable agency has 12    made a good faith determination that it is necessary and 13    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 14    exemption and if the process is conducted in a manner 15    substantially in accordance with the requirements of 16    Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 50-10, 50-10.5, 17    50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 50-36, 50-37, 18    50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for Section 50-35, 19    compliance applies only to contracts or subcontracts over 20    $100,000. Notice of each contract entered into under this 21    paragraph (18) that is related to the procurement of goods 22    and services identified in paragraph (1) through (9) of 23    this subsection shall be published in the Procurement 24    Bulletin within 14 calendar days after contract execution. 25    The Chief Procurement Officer shall prescribe the form and 26    content of the notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief   SB0020- 29 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Procurement Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and 2    content prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a 3    report of contracts that are related to the procurement of 4    goods and services identified in this subsection. At a 5    minimum, this report shall include the name of the 6    contractor, a description of the supply or service 7    provided, the total amount of the contract, the term of 8    the contract, and the exception to this Code utilized. A 9    copy of any or all of these contracts shall be made 10    available to the Chief Procurement Officer immediately 11    upon request. The Chief Procurement Officer shall submit a 12    report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 13    November 1 of each year that includes, at a minimum, an 14    annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 15    Chief Procurement Officer. This exemption becomes 16    inoperative 7 5 years after June 25, 2019 (the effective 17    date of Public Act 101-27).18        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 19    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 20    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 21    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 22    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 23    complete the job application process and be considered for 24    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 25    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 26    qualified current employee with a disability to perform   SB0020- 30 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    the essential functions of the position held by that 2    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 3    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 4    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 5    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 6    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 7    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 8    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 9        For purposes of this paragraph (19):10        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 11    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 12    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 13    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 14    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.15        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 16    directly assists an individual with a disability in 17    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 18    device.19        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 20    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 21    describing an individual with a disability. 22        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 23    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 24    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 25    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 26    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a   SB0020- 31 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 2    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section 3    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 4        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 5    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 6    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 7    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 8    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 9    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 10    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 11    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 12    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 13    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 14    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 15    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 16    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 17    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 18    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 19    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 20    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 21    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 22        (22) Contracts for project management services and 23    system integration services required for the completion of 24    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 25    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 26    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by   SB0020- 32 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 2    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 3    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 4    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 5    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 6    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 7        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 8    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 9    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 10    good faith determination that it is necessary and 11    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 12    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 13    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 14    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 15    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 16    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 17    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 18    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 19        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 20    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 21    announcements, and public awareness and education 22    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 23    providers of those services that inform the public on 24    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 25        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 26    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early   SB0020- 33 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 2    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 3    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 4    shall only be used for products and services procured 5    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 6    procurements may include those necessary to design and 7    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 8    services. The procurements may include, but are not 9    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 10    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 11    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 12    technical assistance and professional development, design 13    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 14    implement management and operational structures, and 15    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 16    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 17    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 18    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 19    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 20    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 21    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 22    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 23    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 24    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 25    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 26    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list   SB0020- 34 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 2    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 3    after July 1, 2027. 4        (26) (25) Procurements that are necessary for 5    increasing the recruitment and retention of State 6    employees, particularly minority candidates for 7    employment, including: 8            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 9        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;10            (B) production of recruitment materials; and11            (C) other services related to recruitment and 12        retention of State employees.13        The exemption under this paragraph (26) (25) applies 14    only if the State agency has made a good faith 15    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 16    expenditure to fall within this paragraph (26) (25). The 17    procurement process under this paragraph (26) (25) shall 18    be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with 19    the requirements of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 20    50 of this Code. A copy of these contracts shall be made 21    available to the Chief Procurement Officer immediately 22    upon request. Nothing in this paragraph (26) (25) 23    authorizes the replacement or diminishment of State 24    responsibilities in hiring or the positions that 25    effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) (25) is 26    inoperative on and after June 30, 2029.   SB0020- 35 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 2with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 3after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 4paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 5or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 6procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 7of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 8contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 9Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 10report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 11November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 12annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 13chief procurement officer. 14    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 15procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 16Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 17Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 18technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 19Illinois Power Agency Act. 20    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 21and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 22Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 23procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 24Illinois Lottery Law. 25    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 26Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to   SB0020- 36 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 2to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 3facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 4Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 5of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 6of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 7costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 8construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 9full duration of construction.10    (f) (Blank). 11    (g) (Blank).12    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 13contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 1411-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 15    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 16necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 17expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 18Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 19privilege. 20    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 21Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 22of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 23Board Act. 24    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 25contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 26Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers   SB0020- 37 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 2    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 3Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 4services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 5Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 6funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 7Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 8    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 9funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 10assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 11Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 12necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 13Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 14the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 15Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16(Source: P.A. 102-175, eff. 7-29-21; 102-483, eff 1-1-22; 17102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-600, eff. 8-27-21; 102-662, eff. 189-15-21; 102-721, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 19102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 206-27-23; 103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, 21eff. 6-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 22revised 11-26-24.) 23    Section 810. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 24Section 6z-112 as follows:   SB0020- 38 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (30 ILCS 105/6z-112)2    Sec. 6z-112. The Cannabis Regulation Fund.3    (a) There is created the Cannabis Regulation Fund in the 4State treasury, subject to appropriations unless otherwise 5provided in this Section. All moneys collected under the 6Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act shall be deposited into the 7Cannabis Regulation Fund, consisting of taxes, license fees, 8other fees, and any other amounts required to be deposited or 9transferred into the Fund.10    (b) Whenever the Department of Revenue determines that a 11refund should be made under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 12Act to a claimant, the Department of Revenue shall submit a 13voucher for payment to the State Comptroller, who shall cause 14the order to be drawn for the amount specified and to the 15person named in the notification from the Department of 16Revenue. This subsection (b) shall constitute an irrevocable 17and continuing appropriation of all amounts necessary for the 18payment of refunds out of the Fund as authorized under this 19subsection (b).20    (c) On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 21Department of Revenue shall prepare and certify to the State 22Comptroller the transfer and allocations of stated sums of 23money from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to other named funds 24in the State treasury. The amount subject to transfer shall be 25the amount of the taxes, license fees, other fees, and any 26other amounts paid into the Fund during the second preceding   SB0020- 39 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1calendar month, minus the refunds made under subsection (b) 2during the second preceding calendar month by the Department. 3The transfers shall be certified as follows:4        (1) The Department of Revenue shall first determine 5    the allocations which shall remain in the Cannabis 6    Regulation Fund, subject to appropriations, to pay for the 7    direct and indirect costs associated with the 8    implementation, administration, and enforcement of the 9    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act by the Department of 10    Revenue, the Department of State Police, the Department of 11    Financial and Professional Regulation, the Department of 12    Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, the 13    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the 14    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority, and the 15    Hemp Consumer Products Act by the Department of 16    Agriculture.17        (2) After the allocations have been made as provided 18    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), of the remainder 19    of the amount subject to transfer for the month as 20    determined in this subsection (c), the Department shall 21    certify the transfer into the Cannabis Expungement Fund 22    1/12 of the fiscal year amount appropriated from the 23    Cannabis Expungement Fund for payment of costs incurred by 24    State courts, the Attorney General, State's Attorneys, 25    civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 26    Interest Attorney Assistance Act, and the Department of   SB0020- 40 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    State Police to facilitate petitions for expungement of 2    Minor Cannabis Offenses pursuant to Public Act 101-27, as 3    adjusted by any supplemental appropriation, plus 4    cumulative deficiencies in such transfers for prior 5    months.6        (3) After the allocations have been made as provided 7    in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection (c), the 8    Department of Revenue shall certify to the State 9    Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 10    amounts that the Department of Revenue determines shall be 11    transferred into the following named funds according to 12    the following:13            (A) 2% shall be transferred to the Drug Treatment 14        Fund to be used by the Department of Human Services 15        for: (i) developing and administering a scientifically 16        and medically accurate public education campaign 17        educating youth and adults about the health and safety 18        risks of alcohol, tobacco, illegal drug use (including 19        prescription drugs), and cannabis, including use by 20        pregnant women; and (ii) data collection and analysis 21        of the public health impacts of legalizing the 22        recreational use of cannabis. Expenditures for these 23        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.24            (B) 8% shall be transferred to the Local 25        Government Distributive Fund and allocated as provided 26        in Section 2 of the State Revenue Sharing Act. The   SB0020- 41 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        moneys shall be used to fund crime prevention 2        programs, training, and interdiction efforts, 3        including detection, enforcement, and prevention 4        efforts, relating to the illegal cannabis market and 5        driving under the influence of cannabis.6            (C) 25% shall be transferred to the Criminal 7        Justice Information Projects Fund to be used for the 8        purposes of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program 9        to address economic development, violence prevention 10        services, re-entry services, youth development, and 11        civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 12        Interest Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, 13        Reinvest, and Renew Program shall address these issues 14        through targeted investments and intervention programs 15        and promotion of an employment infrastructure and 16        capacity building related to the social determinants 17        of health in impacted community areas. Expenditures 18        for these purposes shall be subject to appropriations.19            (D) 20% shall be transferred to the Department of 20        Human Services Community Services Fund, to be used to 21        address substance abuse and prevention and mental 22        health concerns, including treatment, education, and 23        prevention to address the negative impacts of 24        substance abuse and mental health issues, including 25        concentrated poverty, violence, and the historical 26        overuse of criminal justice responses in certain   SB0020- 42 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        communities, on the individual, family, and community, 2        including federal, State, and local governments, 3        health care institutions and providers, and 4        correctional facilities. Expenditures for these 5        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.6            (E) 10% shall be transferred to the Budget 7        Stabilization Fund.8            (F) 35%, or any remaining balance, shall be 9        transferred to the General Revenue Fund.10    As soon as may be practical, but no later than 10 days 11after receipt, by the State Comptroller of the transfer 12certification provided for in this subsection (c) to be given 13to the State Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the 14State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 15transfer the respective amounts in accordance with the 16directions contained in such certification.17    (d) On July 1, 2019 the Department of Revenue shall 18certify to the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall 19transfer $5,000,000 from the Compassionate Use of Medical 20Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis Regulation Fund.21    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and 22except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Fund is not 23subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs, or any other 24fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would in any way transfer 25any amounts from this Fund into any other fund of the State.26    (f) The Cannabis Regulation Fund shall retain a balance of   SB0020- 43 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1$1,000,000 for the purposes of administrative costs.2    (g) In Fiscal Year 2024 the allocations in subsection (c) 3of this Section shall be reviewed and adjusted if the General 4Assembly finds there is a greater need for funding for a 5specific purpose in the State as it relates to Public Act 6101-27.7(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    Section 815. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is 9amended by changing Sections 1-10, 15-155, 55-35, 60-10, 1060-15, and 60-20 and by adding Sections 20-60, 30-30, 35-25, 11and 55-5.5 as follows: 12    (410 ILCS 705/1-10)13    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:14    "Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a license 15issued by the Department of Agriculture that permits a person 16to act as a cultivation center under this Act and any 17administrative rule made in furtherance of this Act.18    "Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" means a 19license issued by the Department of Financial and Professional 20Regulation that permits a person to act as a dispensing 21organization under this Act and any administrative rule made 22in furtherance of this Act.23    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities 24including, but not limited to: newspaper, radio, Internet and   SB0020- 44 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1electronic media, and television advertising; the distribution 2of fliers and circulars; billboard advertising; and the 3display of window and interior signs. "Advertise" does not 4mean exterior signage displaying only the name of the licensed 5cannabis business establishment. 6    "Application points" means the number of points a 7Dispensary Applicant receives on an application for a 8Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 9    "BLS Region" means a region in Illinois used by the United 10States Bureau of Labor Statistics to gather and categorize 11certain employment and wage data. The 17 such regions in 12Illinois are: Bloomington, Cape Girardeau, Carbondale-Marion, 13Champaign-Urbana, Chicago-Naperville-Elgin, Danville, 14Davenport-Moline-Rock Island, Decatur, Kankakee, Peoria, 15Rockford, St. Louis, Springfield, Northwest Illinois 16nonmetropolitan area, West Central Illinois nonmetropolitan 17area, East Central Illinois nonmetropolitan area, and South 18Illinois nonmetropolitan area. 19    "By lot" means a randomized method of choosing between 2 20or more Eligible Tied Applicants or 2 or more Qualifying 21Applicants.22    "Cannabis" means marijuana, hashish, and other substances 23that are identified as including any parts of the plant 24Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such 25as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not; 26the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the   SB0020- 45 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1plant; and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, 2mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin, 3including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other naturally 4produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or 5indirectly by extraction, including, but not limited to, any 6structural, optical, or geometric isomers of THC, or any 7chemical compound that mimics THC; however, "cannabis" does 8not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced 9from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, 10any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 11preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted 12from it), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the 13plant that is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" does not 14include industrial hemp as defined and authorized under the 15Industrial Hemp Act. "Cannabis" also means cannabis flower, 16concentrate, and cannabis-infused products and any product 17whether derived from natural or synthetic sources with a THC 18concentration greater than the THC limit set forth in the 19definition of Hemp consumer CBD product in the Hemp Consumer 20Products Act.21    "Cannabis business establishment" means a cultivation 22center, craft grower, processing organization, infuser 23organization, dispensing organization, or transporting 24organization.25    "Cannabis concentrate" means a product derived from 26cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids,   SB0020- 46 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), from the plant through 2the use of propylene glycol, glycerin, butter, olive oil, or 3other typical cooking fats; water, ice, or dry ice; or butane, 4propane, CO2, ethanol, or isopropanol and with the intended 5use of smoking or making a cannabis-infused product. The use 6of any other solvent is expressly prohibited unless and until 7it is approved by the Department of Agriculture.8    "Cannabis container" means a sealed or resealable, 9traceable, container, or package used for the purpose of 10containment of cannabis or cannabis-infused product during 11transportation.12    "Cannabis flower" means marijuana, hashish, and other 13substances that are identified as including any parts of the 14plant Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, 15such as indica, of all strains of cannabis; including raw 16kief, leaves, and buds, but not resin that has been extracted 17from any part of such plant; nor any compound, manufacture, 18salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its 19seeds, or resin.20    "Cannabis-infused product" means a beverage, food, oil, 21ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or another product 22containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that is not 23intended to be smoked.24    "Cannabis paraphernalia" means equipment, products, or 25materials intended to be used for planting, propagating, 26cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, producing,   SB0020- 47 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 2repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, ingesting, or 3otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body. 4    "Cannabis plant monitoring system" or "plant monitoring 5system" means a system that includes, but is not limited to, 6testing and data collection established and maintained by the 7cultivation center, craft grower, or processing organization 8and that is available to the Department of Revenue, the 9Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 10Professional Regulation, and the Illinois State Police for the 11purposes of documenting each cannabis plant and monitoring 12plant development throughout the life cycle of a cannabis 13plant cultivated for the intended use by a customer from seed 14planting to final packaging.15    "Cannabis testing facility" means an entity registered by 16the Department of Agriculture to test cannabis for potency and 17contaminants.18    "Clone" means a plant section from a female cannabis plant 19not yet rootbound, growing in a water solution or other 20propagation matrix, that is capable of developing into a new 21plant.22    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 23Program faculty participant" means a person who is 21 years of 24age or older, licensed by the Department of Agriculture, and 25is employed or contracted by an Illinois community college to 26provide student instruction using cannabis plants at an   SB0020- 48 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1Illinois community college Community College.2    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 3Program faculty participant Agent Identification Card" means a 4document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 5identifies a person as a Community College Cannabis Vocational 6Training Pilot Program faculty participant.7    "Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 8means a contingent license awarded to applicants for an Adult 9Use Dispensing Organization License that reserves the right to 10an Adult Use Dispensing Organization License if the applicant 11meets certain conditions described in this Act, but does not 12entitle the recipient to begin purchasing or selling cannabis 13or cannabis-infused products.14    "Conditional Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a 15license awarded to top-scoring applicants for an Adult Use 16Cultivation Center License that reserves the right to an Adult 17Use Cultivation Center License if the applicant meets certain 18conditions as determined by the Department of Agriculture by 19rule, but does not entitle the recipient to begin growing, 20processing, or selling cannabis or cannabis-infused products.21    "Craft grower" means a facility operated by an 22organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 23Agriculture to cultivate, dry, cure, and package cannabis and 24perform other necessary activities to make cannabis available 25for sale at a dispensing organization or use at a processing 26organization. A craft grower may contain up to 5,000 square   SB0020- 49 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1feet of canopy space on its premises for plants in the 2flowering state. The Department of Agriculture may authorize 3an increase or decrease of flowering stage cultivation space 4in increments of 3,000 square feet by rule based on market 5need, craft grower capacity, and the licensee's history of 6compliance or noncompliance, with a maximum space of 14,000 7square feet for cultivating plants in the flowering stage, 8which must be cultivated in all stages of growth in an enclosed 9and secure area. A craft grower may share premises with a 10processing organization or a dispensing organization, or both, 11provided each licensee stores currency and cannabis or 12cannabis-infused products in a separate secured vault to which 13the other licensee does not have access or all licensees 14sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership. 15    "Craft grower agent" means a principal officer, board 16member, employee, or other agent of a craft grower who is 21 17years of age or older.18    "Craft Grower Agent Identification Card" means a document 19issued by the Department of Agriculture that identifies a 20person as a craft grower agent.21    "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 22organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 23Agriculture to cultivate, process, transport (unless otherwise 24limited by this Act), and perform other necessary activities 25to provide cannabis and cannabis-infused products to cannabis 26business establishments.  SB0020- 50 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 2board member, employee, or other agent of a cultivation center 3who is 21 years of age or older.4    "Cultivation Center Agent Identification Card" means a 5document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 6identifies a person as a cultivation center agent.7    "Currency" means currency and coin of the United States.8    "Dispensary" means a facility operated by a dispensing 9organization at which activities licensed by this Act may 10occur.11    "Dispensary Applicant" means the Proposed Dispensing 12Organization Name as stated on an application for a 13Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 14    "Dispensing organization" means a facility operated by an 15organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 16Financial and Professional Regulation to acquire cannabis from 17a cultivation center, craft grower, processing organization, 18or another dispensary for the purpose of selling or dispensing 19cannabis, cannabis-infused products, cannabis seeds, 20paraphernalia, or related supplies under this Act to 21purchasers or to qualified registered medical cannabis 22patients and caregivers. As used in this Act, "dispensing 23organization" includes a registered medical cannabis 24organization as defined in the Compassionate Use of Medical 25Cannabis Program Act or its successor Act that has obtained an 26Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License.  SB0020- 51 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    "Dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 2employee, or agent of a dispensing organization who is 21 3years of age or older.4    "Dispensing organization agent identification card" means 5a document issued by the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a 7dispensing organization agent.8    "Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or 9comparable geographic area that satisfies the following 10criteria as determined by the Department of Commerce and 11Economic Opportunity, that: 12        (1) meets at least one of the following criteria: 13            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 14        according to the latest federal decennial census; or 15            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 16        participate in the federal free lunch program 17        according to reported statistics from the State Board 18        of Education; or 19            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 20        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 21        Assistance Program; or22            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 23        determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 24        Security, that is more than 120% of the national 25        unemployment average, as determined by the United 26        States Department of Labor, for a period of at least 2   SB0020- 52 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the 2        application; and 3        (2) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 4    incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, 5    cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.6    "Early Approval Adult Use Cultivation Center License" 7means a license that permits a medical cannabis cultivation 8center licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 9Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 10begin cultivating, infusing, packaging, transporting (unless 11otherwise provided in this Act), processing, and selling 12cannabis or cannabis-infused product to cannabis business 13establishments for resale to purchasers as permitted by this 14Act as of January 1, 2020.15    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 16means a license that permits a medical cannabis dispensing 17organization licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 18Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 19begin selling cannabis or cannabis-infused product to 20purchasers as permitted by this Act as of January 1, 2020.21    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization at a 22secondary site" means a license that permits a medical 23cannabis dispensing organization licensed under the 24Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act as of the 25effective date of this Act to begin selling cannabis or 26cannabis-infused product to purchasers as permitted by this   SB0020- 53 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1Act on January 1, 2020 at a different dispensary location from 2its existing registered medical dispensary location.3    "Eligible Tied Applicant" means a Tied Applicant that is 4eligible to participate in the process by which a remaining 5available license is distributed by lot pursuant to a Tied 6Applicant Lottery. 7    "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 8building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 9security devices that permit access only by cannabis business 10establishment agents working for the licensed cannabis 11business establishment or acting pursuant to this Act to 12cultivate, process, store, or distribute cannabis.13    "Enclosed, locked space" means a closet, room, greenhouse, 14building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 15security devices that permit access only by authorized 16individuals under this Act. "Enclosed, locked space" may 17include:18        (1) a space within a residential building that (i) is 19    the primary residence of the individual cultivating 5 or 20    fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5 inches tall and 21    (ii) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing. The 22    space must only be accessible by a key or code that is 23    different from any key or code that can be used to access 24    the residential building from the exterior; or25        (2) a structure, such as a shed or greenhouse, that 26    lies on the same plot of land as a residential building   SB0020- 54 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    that (i) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing 2    and (ii) is used as a primary residence by the person 3    cultivating 5 or fewer cannabis plants that are more than 4    5 inches tall, such as a shed or greenhouse. The structure 5    must remain locked when it is unoccupied by people. 6    "Financial institution" has the same meaning as "financial 7organization" as defined in Section 1501 of the Illinois 8Income Tax Act, and also includes the holding companies, 9subsidiaries, and affiliates of such financial organizations. 10    "Flowering stage" means the stage of cultivation where and 11when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material 12for cannabis products. This includes mature plants as follows:13        (1) if greater than 2 stigmas are visible at each 14    internode of the plant; or15        (2) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has been 16    intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 17    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, 18    from the moment the light deprivation began through the 19    remainder of the marijuana plant growth cycle.20    "Individual" means a natural person.21    "Infuser organization" or "infuser" means a facility 22operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 23the Department of Agriculture to directly incorporate cannabis 24or cannabis concentrate into a product formulation to produce 25a cannabis-infused product. 26    "Kief" means the resinous crystal-like trichomes that are   SB0020- 55 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1found on cannabis and that are accumulated, resulting in a 2higher concentration of cannabinoids, untreated by heat or 3pressure, or extracted using a solvent. 4    "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a 5cannabis business establishment and any labor organization 6recognized under the National Labor Relations Act, referred to 7in this Act as a bona fide labor organization, that prohibits 8labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, 9work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference 10with the cannabis business establishment. This agreement means 11that the cannabis business establishment has agreed not to 12disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to 13communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the 14cannabis business establishment's employees. The agreement 15shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at 16reasonable times to areas in which the cannabis business 17establishment's employees work, for the purpose of meeting 18with employees to discuss their right to representation, 19employment rights under State law, and terms and conditions of 20employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a 21particular method of election or certification of the bona 22fide labor organization.23    "Limited access area" means a room or other area under the 24control of a cannabis dispensing organization licensed under 25this Act and upon the licensed premises where cannabis sales 26occur with access limited to purchasers, dispensing   SB0020- 56 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1organization owners and other dispensing organization agents, 2or service professionals conducting business with the 3dispensing organization, or, if sales to registered qualifying 4patients, caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid 5Alternative Pilot Program participants licensed pursuant to 6the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act are also 7permitted at the dispensary, registered qualifying patients, 8caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid Alternative Pilot 9Program participants. 10    "Member of an impacted family" means an individual who has 11a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was 12a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date 13of this Act, was arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated 14delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement 15under this Act.16    "Mother plant" means a cannabis plant that is cultivated 17or maintained for the purpose of generating clones, and that 18will not be used to produce plant material for sale to an 19infuser or dispensing organization.20    "Ordinary public view" means within the sight line with 21normal visual range of a person, unassisted by visual aids, 22from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property, or 23from within an adjacent property. 24    "Ownership and control" means ownership of at least 51% of 25the business, including corporate stock if a corporation, and 26control over the management and day-to-day operations of the   SB0020- 57 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1business and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits 2and losses of the business proportionate to percentage of 3ownership.4    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 5association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 6private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 7executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 8by order of any court.9    "Possession limit" means the amount of cannabis under 10Section 10-10 that may be possessed at any one time by a person 1121 years of age or older or who is a registered qualifying 12medical cannabis patient or caregiver under the Compassionate 13Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.14    "Principal officer" includes a cannabis business 15establishment applicant or licensed cannabis business 16establishment's board member, owner with more than 1% interest 17of the total cannabis business establishment or more than 5% 18interest of the total cannabis business establishment of a 19publicly traded company, president, vice president, secretary, 20treasurer, partner, officer, member, manager member, or person 21with a profit sharing, financial interest, or revenue sharing 22arrangement. The definition includes a person with authority 23to control the cannabis business establishment, a person who 24assumes responsibility for the debts of the cannabis business 25establishment and who is further defined in this Act.26    "Primary residence" means a dwelling where a person   SB0020- 58 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1usually stays or stays more often than other locations. It may 2be determined by, without limitation, presence, tax filings; 3address on an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 4Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a Disability 5Identification Card; or voter registration. No person may have 6more than one primary residence.7    "Processing organization" or "processor" means a facility 8operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 9the Department of Agriculture to either extract constituent 10chemicals or compounds to produce cannabis concentrate or 11incorporate cannabis or cannabis concentrate into a product 12formulation to produce a cannabis product. 13    "Processing organization agent" means a principal officer, 14board member, employee, or agent of a processing organization.15    "Processing organization agent identification card" means 16a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 17identifies a person as a processing organization agent.18    "Purchaser" means a person 21 years of age or older who 19acquires cannabis for a valuable consideration. "Purchaser" 20does not include a cardholder under the Compassionate Use of 21Medical Cannabis Program Act.22    "Qualifying Applicant" means an applicant that submitted 23an application pursuant to Section 15-30 that received at 24least 85% of 250 application points available under Section 2515-30 as the applicant's final score and meets the definition 26of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under this Section.  SB0020- 59 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    "Qualifying Social Equity Justice Involved Applicant" 2means an applicant that submitted an application pursuant to 3Section 15-30 that received at least 85% of 250 application 4points available under Section 15-30 as the applicant's final 5score and meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) of 6the definition of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under 7this Section. 8    "Qualified Social Equity Applicant" means a Social Equity 9Applicant who has been awarded a conditional license under 10this Act to operate a cannabis business establishment.11    "Resided" means an individual's primary residence was 12located within the relevant geographic area as established by 132 of the following:14        (1) a signed lease agreement that includes the 15    applicant's name;16        (2) a property deed that includes the applicant's 17    name;18        (3) school records;19        (4) a voter registration card;20        (5) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 21    Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 22    Disability Identification Card;23        (6) a paycheck stub; 24        (7) a utility bill; 25        (8) tax records; or26        (9) any other proof of residency or other information   SB0020- 60 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    necessary to establish residence as provided by rule.2    "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke caused by the 3combustion of cannabis.4    "Social Equity Applicant" means an applicant that is an 5Illinois resident that meets one of the following criteria:6        (1) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 7    control by one or more individuals who have resided for at 8    least 5 of the preceding 10 years in a Disproportionately 9    Impacted Area; 10        (2) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 11    control by one or more individuals who: 12            (i) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 13        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 14        eligible for expungement under this Act; or 15            (ii) is a member of an impacted family;16        (3) for applicants with a minimum of 10 full-time 17    employees, an applicant with at least 51% of current 18    employees who:19            (i) currently reside in a Disproportionately 20        Impacted Area; or21            (ii) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 22        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 23        eligible for expungement under this Act or member of 24        an impacted family.25    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt or limit 26the duties of any employer under the Job Opportunities for   SB0020- 61 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1Qualified Applicants Act. Nothing in this Act shall permit an 2employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged 3offenses, unless otherwise required by law.4    "Tetrahydrocannabinol" or "THC" means any naturally 5occurring or synthetic tetrahydrocannabinol, including its 6salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of 7such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within 8the specific chemical designation and any preparation, 9mixture, or substance containing, or mixed or infused with, 10any detectable amount of tetrahydrocannabinol or 11tetrahydrocannabolic acid, including, but not limited to, 12delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, 13delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabolic acid, 14tetrahydrocannabiphorol, or hexahydrocannabinol, however 15derived, or any other substance determined to have similar 16intoxicating effects on the mind or body by the Department. 17For the purposes of this definition, "isomer" means the 18optical, position, and geometric isomers. 19    "Tied Applicant" means an application submitted by a 20Dispensary Applicant pursuant to Section 15-30 that received 21the same number of application points under Section 15-30 as 22the Dispensary Applicant's final score as one or more 23top-scoring applications in the same BLS Region and would have 24been awarded a license but for the one or more other 25top-scoring applications that received the same number of 26application points. Each application for which a Dispensary   SB0020- 62 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1Applicant was required to pay a required application fee for 2the application period ending January 2, 2020 shall be 3considered an application of a separate Tied Applicant.4    "Tied Applicant Lottery" means the process established 5under 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1291.50 for awarding Conditional Adult 6Use Dispensing Organization Licenses pursuant to Sections 715-25 and 15-30 among Eligible Tied Applicants. 8    "Tincture" means a cannabis-infused solution, typically 9comprised of alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oils, derived 10either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed 11cannabis extract. A tincture is not an alcoholic liquor as 12defined in the Liquor Control Act of 1934. A tincture shall 13include a calibrated dropper or other similar device capable 14of accurately measuring servings.15    "Transporting organization" or "transporter" means an 16organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 17Agriculture to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused product 18on behalf of a cannabis business establishment or a community 19college licensed under the Community College Cannabis 20Vocational Training Pilot Program. 21    "Transporting organization agent" means a principal 22officer, board member, employee, or agent of a transporting 23organization.24    "Transporting organization agent identification card" 25means a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 26identifies a person as a transporting organization agent.  SB0020- 63 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    "Unit of local government" means any county, city, 2village, or incorporated town.3    "Vegetative stage" means the stage of cultivation in which 4a cannabis plant is propagated to produce additional cannabis 5plants or reach a sufficient size for production. This 6includes seedlings, clones, mothers, and other immature 7cannabis plants as follows: 8        (1) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has not 9    been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 10    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, it 11    has no more than 2 stigmas visible at each internode of the 12    cannabis plant; or 13        (2) any cannabis plant that is cultivated solely for 14    the purpose of propagating clones and is never used to 15    produce cannabis.16(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 17102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 185-13-22.) 19    (410 ILCS 705/15-155)20    Sec. 15-155. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil 21penalty. 22    (a) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any 23person who practices, offers to practice, attempts to 24practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a licensed 25dispensing organization owner, principal officer,   SB0020- 64 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1agent-in-charge, or agent, cultivates, processes, distributes, 2sells, or offers for sale cannabis, cannabis-infused products, 3cannabis concentrates, or cannabis flower without being 4licensed under this Act shall, in addition to any other 5penalty provided by law, pay a civil penalty to the Department 6of Financial and Professional Regulation in an amount not to 7exceed $10,000 for each offense as determined by the 8Department. Each day a person engages in unlicensed practice 9in violation of the provisions of this Section constitutes a 10separate offense. The civil penalty shall be assessed by the 11Department after a hearing is held in accordance with the 12provisions set forth in this Act regarding the provision of a 13hearing for the discipline of a licensee.14    (b) The Department, the Attorney General, any State or 15local law enforcement agency, or any State's Attorney has the 16authority and power to investigate any and all unlicensed 17activity.18    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 19the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty or 20in accordance with the order imposing the civil penalty. The 21order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 22execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 23any court of this State. 24    (d) A violation of subsection (a) is an unlawful practice 25under Section 2 of the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 26Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted   SB0020- 65 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1to the Attorney General under that Act shall be available for 2the enforcement of this Act.3    (e) Nothing in this Section prohibits a unit of local 4government from enacting a local law or ordinance to carry out 5enforcement activities and assess civil penalties against 6unlicensed cannabis sales. 7(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 8    (410 ILCS 705/20-60 new)9    Sec. 20-60. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty.10    (a) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any 11person who practices, offers to practice, attempts to 12practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a licensed 13cultivation center, infuser, or craft grower owner, principal 14officer, agent-in-charge, or agent or who cultivates, 15processes, distributes, sells, or offers for sale cannabis, 16cannabis-infused products, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis 17flower without being licensed under this Act shall, in 18addition to any other penalty provided by law, pay a civil 19penalty to the Department of Agriculture in an amount not to 20exceed $10,000 for each offense. Each day any person engages 21in unlicensed practice in violation of the provisions of this 22Section constitutes a separate offense. The civil penalty 23shall be assessed by the Department after a hearing is held in 24accordance with the provisions set forth in this Act regarding 25hearings for the discipline of a licensee.  SB0020- 66 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (b) The Department, the Attorney General, any State or 2local law enforcement agency, or any State's Attorney has the 3authority and power to investigate any and all unlicensed 4activity.5    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 6the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty or 7in accordance with the order imposing the civil penalty. The 8order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 9execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 10any court of this State.11    (d) In addition to any other remedies or penalties 12provided by law, a unit of local government may suspend or 13revoke any locally established licenses held by the person, 14and prohibit the person from further operations and seize any 15cannabis or THC product.  16    (410 ILCS 705/30-30)17    Sec. 30-30. Craft grower requirements; prohibitions. 18    (a) The operating documents of a craft grower shall 19include procedures for the oversight of the craft grower, a 20cannabis plant monitoring system including a physical 21inventory recorded weekly, accurate recordkeeping, and a 22staffing plan.23    (b) A craft grower shall implement a security plan 24reviewed by the Illinois State Police that includes, but is 25not limited to: facility access controls, perimeter intrusion   SB0020- 67 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1detection systems, personnel identification systems, and a 224-hour surveillance system to monitor the interior and 3exterior of the craft grower facility and that is accessible 4to authorized law enforcement and the Department of 5Agriculture in real time. 6    (c) All cultivation of cannabis by a craft grower must 7take place in an enclosed, locked facility at the physical 8address provided to the Department of Agriculture during the 9licensing process. The craft grower location shall only be 10accessed by the agents working for the craft grower, the 11Department of Agriculture staff performing inspections, the 12Department of Public Health staff performing inspections, 13State and local law enforcement or other emergency personnel, 14contractors working on jobs unrelated to cannabis, such as 15installing or maintaining security devices or performing 16electrical wiring, transporting organization agents as 17provided in this Act, or participants in the incubator 18program, individuals in a mentoring or educational program 19approved by the State, or other individuals as provided by 20rule. However, if a craft grower shares a premises with an 21infuser or dispensing organization, agents from those other 22licensees may access the craft grower portion of the premises 23if that is the location of common bathrooms, lunchrooms, 24locker rooms, or other areas of the building where work or 25cultivation of cannabis is not performed. At no time may an 26infuser or dispensing organization agent perform work at a   SB0020- 68 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1craft grower without being a registered agent of the craft 2grower.3    (d) A craft grower may not sell or distribute any cannabis 4to any person other than a cultivation center, a craft grower, 5an infuser organization, a dispensing organization, or as 6otherwise authorized by rule.7    (e) A craft grower may not be located in an area zoned for 8residential use.9    (f) A craft grower may not either directly or indirectly 10discriminate in price between different cannabis business 11establishments that are purchasing a like grade, strain, 12brand, and quality of cannabis or cannabis-infused product. 13Nothing in this subsection (f) prevents a craft grower from 14pricing cannabis differently based on differences in the cost 15of manufacturing or processing, the quantities sold, such as 16volume discounts, or the way the products are delivered.17    (g) All cannabis harvested by a craft grower and intended 18for distribution to a dispensing organization must be entered 19into a data collection system, packaged and labeled under 20Section 55-21, and, if distribution is to a dispensing 21organization that does not share a premises with the 22dispensing organization receiving the cannabis, placed into a 23cannabis container for transport. All cannabis harvested by a 24craft grower and intended for distribution to a cultivation 25center, to an infuser organization, or to a craft grower with 26which it does not share a premises, must be packaged in a   SB0020- 69 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1labeled cannabis container and entered into a data collection 2system before transport.3    (h) Craft growers are subject to random inspections by the 4Department of Agriculture, local safety or health inspectors, 5the Illinois State Police, or as provided by rule.6    (i) A craft grower agent shall notify local law 7enforcement, the Illinois State Police, and the Department of 8Agriculture within 24 hours of the discovery of any loss or 9theft. Notification shall be made by phone, in person, or 10written or electronic communication.11    (j) A craft grower shall comply with all State and any 12applicable federal rules and regulations regarding the use of 13pesticides.14    (k) A craft grower or craft grower agent shall not 15transport cannabis or cannabis-infused products to any other 16cannabis business establishment without a transport 17organization license unless:18        (i) If the craft grower is located in a county with a 19    population of 3,000,000 or more, the cannabis business 20    establishment receiving the cannabis is within 2,000 feet 21    of the property line of the craft grower;22        (ii) If the craft grower is located in a county with a 23    population of more than 700,000 but fewer than 3,000,000, 24    the cannabis business establishment receiving the cannabis 25    is within 2 miles of the craft grower; or26        (iii) If the craft grower is located in a county with a   SB0020- 70 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    population of fewer than 700,000, the cannabis business 2    establishment receiving the cannabis is within 15 miles of 3    the craft grower.4    (l) A craft grower may enter into a contract with a 5transporting organization to transport cannabis to a 6cultivation center, a craft grower, an infuser organization, a 7dispensing organization, or a laboratory.8    (m) No person or entity shall hold any legal, equitable, 9ownership, or beneficial interest, directly or indirectly, of 10more than 3 craft grower licenses. Further, no person or 11entity that is employed by, an agent of, or has a contract to 12receive payment from or participate in the management of a 13craft grower, is a principal officer of a craft grower, or 14entity controlled by or affiliated with a principal officer of 15a craft grower shall hold any legal, equitable, ownership, or 16beneficial interest, directly or indirectly, in a craft grower 17license that would result in the person or entity owning or 18controlling in combination with any craft grower, principal 19officer of a craft grower, or entity controlled or affiliated 20with a principal officer of a craft grower by which he, she, or 21it is employed, is an agent of, or participates in the 22management of more than 3 craft grower licenses.23    (n) It is unlawful for any person having a craft grower 24license or any officer, associate, member, representative, or 25agent of the licensee to offer or deliver money, or anything 26else of value, directly or indirectly, to any person having an   SB0020- 71 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, a 2Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, an 3Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, or a medical 4cannabis dispensing organization license issued under the 5Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act, or to any 6person connected with or in any way representing, or to any 7member of the family of, the person holding an Early Approval 8Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, a Conditional Adult 9Use Dispensing Organization License, an Adult Use Dispensing 10Organization License, or a medical cannabis dispensing 11organization license issued under the Compassionate Use of 12Medical Cannabis Program Act, or to any stockholders in any 13corporation engaged in the retail sale of cannabis, or to any 14officer, manager, agent, or representative of the Early 15Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, a 16Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, an 17Adult Use Dispensing Organization License, or a medical 18cannabis dispensing organization license issued under the 19Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act to obtain 20preferential placement within the dispensing organization, 21including, without limitation, on shelves and in display cases 22where purchasers can view products, or on the dispensing 23organization's website.24    (o) A craft grower shall not be located within 1,500 feet 25of another craft grower or a cultivation center.26    (p) A craft grower may process cannabis, cannabis   SB0020- 72 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1concentrates, and cannabis-infused products.2    (q) A craft grower must comply with any other requirements 3or prohibitions set by administrative rule of the Department 4of Agriculture.5    (r) A craft grower may purchase a hemp-derived 6intoxicating product from a hemp consumer product manufacturer 7and offer a hemp-derived intoxicating product for sale to 8another cannabis business establishment. Once a hemp-derived 9intoxicating product is delivered to a craft grower, it is 10considered cannabis and the craft grower is responsible for 11ensuring the product meets all requirements of this Act. 12(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 13102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 145-13-22.) 15    (410 ILCS 705/35-25)16    Sec. 35-25. Infuser organization requirements; 17prohibitions. 18    (a) The operating documents of an infuser shall include 19procedures for the oversight of the infuser, an inventory 20monitoring system including a physical inventory recorded 21weekly, accurate recordkeeping, and a staffing plan.22    (b) An infuser shall implement a security plan reviewed by 23the Illinois State Police that includes, but is not limited 24to: facility access controls, perimeter intrusion detection 25systems, personnel identification systems, and a 24-hour   SB0020- 73 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1surveillance system to monitor the interior and exterior of 2the infuser facility and that is accessible to authorized law 3enforcement, the Department of Public Health, and the 4Department of Agriculture in real time.5    (c) All processing of cannabis by an infuser must take 6place in an enclosed, locked facility at the physical address 7provided to the Department of Agriculture during the licensing 8process. The infuser location shall only be accessed by the 9agents working for the infuser, the Department of Agriculture 10staff performing inspections, the Department of Public Health 11staff performing inspections, State and local law enforcement 12or other emergency personnel, contractors working on jobs 13unrelated to cannabis, such as installing or maintaining 14security devices or performing electrical wiring, transporting 15organization agents as provided in this Act, participants in 16the incubator program, individuals in a mentoring or 17educational program approved by the State, local safety or 18health inspectors, or other individuals as provided by rule. 19However, if an infuser shares a premises with a craft grower or 20dispensing organization, agents from these other licensees may 21access the infuser portion of the premises if that is the 22location of common bathrooms, lunchrooms, locker rooms, or 23other areas of the building where processing of cannabis is 24not performed. At no time may a craft grower or dispensing 25organization agent perform work at an infuser without being a 26registered agent of the infuser.  SB0020- 74 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (d) An infuser may not sell or distribute any cannabis to 2any person other than a dispensing organization, or as 3otherwise authorized by rule.4    (e) An infuser may not either directly or indirectly 5discriminate in price between different cannabis business 6establishments that are purchasing a like grade, strain, 7brand, and quality of cannabis or cannabis-infused product. 8Nothing in this subsection (e) prevents an infuser from 9pricing cannabis differently based on differences in the cost 10of manufacturing or processing, the quantities sold, such 11volume discounts, or the way the products are delivered.12    (f) All cannabis infused by an infuser and intended for 13distribution to a dispensing organization must be entered into 14a data collection system, packaged and labeled under Section 1555-21, and, if distribution is to a dispensing organization 16that does not share a premises with the infuser, placed into a 17cannabis container for transport. All cannabis produced by an 18infuser and intended for distribution to a cultivation center, 19infuser organization, or craft grower with which it does not 20share a premises, must be packaged in a labeled cannabis 21container and entered into a data collection system before 22transport.23    (g) Infusers are subject to random inspections by the 24Department of Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, 25the Illinois State Police, local law enforcement, or as 26provided by rule.  SB0020- 75 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (h) An infuser agent shall notify local law enforcement, 2the Illinois State Police, and the Department of Agriculture 3within 24 hours of the discovery of any loss or theft. 4Notification shall be made by phone, in person, or by written 5or electronic communication.6    (i) An infuser organization may not be located in an area 7zoned for residential use.8    (j) An infuser or infuser agent shall not transport 9cannabis or cannabis-infused products to any other cannabis 10business establishment without a transport organization 11license unless:12        (i) If the infuser is located in a county with a 13    population of 3,000,000 or more, the cannabis business 14    establishment receiving the cannabis or cannabis-infused 15    product is within 2,000 feet of the property line of the 16    infuser;17        (ii) If the infuser is located in a county with a 18    population of more than 700,000 but fewer than 3,000,000, 19    the cannabis business establishment receiving the cannabis 20    or cannabis-infused product is within 2 miles of the 21    infuser; or22        (iii) If the infuser is located in a county with a 23    population of fewer than 700,000, the cannabis business 24    establishment receiving the cannabis or cannabis-infused 25    product is within 15 miles of the infuser.26    (k) An infuser may enter into a contract with a   SB0020- 76 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1transporting organization to transport cannabis to a 2dispensing organization or a laboratory.3    (l) An infuser organization may share premises with a 4craft grower or a dispensing organization, or both, provided 5each licensee stores currency and cannabis or cannabis-infused 6products in a separate secured vault to which the other 7licensee does not have access or all licensees sharing a vault 8share more than 50% of the same ownership. 9    (m) It is unlawful for any person or entity having an 10infuser organization license or any officer, associate, 11member, representative or agent of such licensee to offer or 12deliver money, or anything else of value, directly or 13indirectly to any person having an Early Approval Adult Use 14Dispensing Organization License, a Conditional Adult Use 15Dispensing Organization License, an Adult Use Dispensing 16Organization License, or a medical cannabis dispensing 17organization license issued under the Compassionate Use of 18Medical Cannabis Program Act, or to any person connected with 19or in any way representing, or to any member of the family of, 20such person holding an Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing 21Organization License, a Conditional Adult Use Dispensing 22Organization License, an Adult Use Dispensing Organization 23License, or a medical cannabis dispensing organization license 24issued under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 25Act, or to any stockholders in any corporation engaged the 26retail sales of cannabis, or to any officer, manager, agent,   SB0020- 77 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1or representative of the Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing 2Organization License, a Conditional Adult Use Dispensing 3Organization License, an Adult Use Dispensing Organization 4License, or a medical cannabis dispensing organization license 5issued under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 6Act to obtain preferential placement within the dispensing 7organization, including, without limitation, on shelves and in 8display cases where purchasers can view products, or on the 9dispensing organization's website.10    (n) At no time shall an infuser organization or an infuser 11agent perform the extraction of cannabis concentrate from 12cannabis flower.13    (o) An infuser may purchase a hemp-derived intoxicating 14product from a hemp consumer product manufacturer and offer a 15hemp-derived intoxicating product for sale to another cannabis 16business establishment. Once a hemp-derived intoxicating 17product is delivered to an infuser, it is considered cannabis 18and the infuser is responsible for ensuring the product meets 19all requirements of this Act. 20(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 21102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 225-13-22.) 23    (410 ILCS 705/55-5.5 new)24    Sec. 55-5.5. Use of hemp in cannabis-infused products.25    (a) For purposes of this Section, "industrial hemp" has   SB0020- 78 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1the meaning given to it under the Industrial Hemp Act.2    (b) Cannabis business establishments licensed by the 3Department of Agriculture for cultivation, growing, 4processing, manufacturing, or infusing of medical or adult use 5cannabis products pursuant to this Act or the Compassionate 6Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act may use industrial hemp as 7an ingredient in cannabis-infused products offered for sale at 8licensed dispensaries in Illinois. Hemp flower shall not be 9sold to dispensaries.10    (c) All hemp obtained under this Section must be used in 11extracted form and in infused cannabis products only.12    (d) Industrial hemp may be procured from third-party 13licensed growers or manufacturers from within the State or any 14other state with a regulated industrial hemp program.15    (e) All hemp and hemp derivatives shall be obtained from a 16licensed or registered hemp grower or manufacturer, regardless 17of the home state of the grower or manufacturer. Cannabis 18producers shall provide a copy of the hemp grower's or 19manufacturer's State-issued license upon demand of the 20Department of Agriculture or the Illinois State Police.21    (f) Industrial hemp flower and biomass may be purchased 22and extracted by licensed cannabis cultivation centers or 23licensed craft growers.24    (g) Licensed cannabis cultivation centers and licensed 25craft growers may procure or process industrial hemp in the 26form of distillate or isolate. Licensed infusers may procure   SB0020- 79 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1industrial hemp in the form of distillate or isolate.2    (h) Hemp and hemp derivatives may not be used to 3concentrate or to synthesize intoxicating compounds and may 4not exceed 0.3% THC.5    (l) Final products containing hemp or hemp derivatives 6sold by a cannabis business establishment shall be 7cannabis-infused products and shall be subject to the 8requirements of the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Act 9and the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act and any applicable 10administrative rules.  11    (410 ILCS 705/55-35)12    Sec. 55-35. Administrative rulemaking. 13    (a) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this 14Act, the Department of Agriculture, the Illinois State Police, 15the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 16Department of Revenue, the Department of Commerce and Economic 17Opportunity, and the Treasurer's Office shall adopt permanent 18rules in accordance with their responsibilities under this 19Act. The Department of Agriculture, the Illinois State Police, 20the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 21Department of Revenue, and the Department of Commerce and 22Economic Opportunity may adopt rules necessary to regulate 23personal cannabis use through the use of emergency rulemaking 24in accordance with subsection (gg) of Section 5-45 of the 25Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The General Assembly   SB0020- 80 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1finds that the adoption of rules to regulate cannabis use is 2deemed an emergency and necessary for the public interest, 3safety, and welfare.4    (b) The Department of Agriculture rules may address, but 5are not limited to, the following matters related to 6cultivation centers, craft growers, infuser organizations, and 7transporting organizations with the goal of protecting against 8diversion and theft, without imposing an undue burden on the 9cultivation centers, craft growers, infuser organizations, or 10transporting organizations:11        (1) oversight requirements for cultivation centers, 12    craft growers, infuser organizations, and transporting 13    organizations;14        (2) recordkeeping requirements for cultivation 15    centers, craft growers, infuser organizations, and 16    transporting organizations;17        (3) security requirements for cultivation centers, 18    craft growers, infuser organizations, and transporting 19    organizations, which shall include that each cultivation 20    center, craft grower, infuser organization, and 21    transporting organization location must be protected by a 22    fully operational security alarm system;23        (4) standards for enclosed, locked facilities under 24    this Act;25        (5) procedures for suspending or revoking the 26    identification cards of agents of cultivation centers,   SB0020- 81 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    craft growers, infuser organizations, and transporting 2    organizations that commit violations of this Act or the 3    rules adopted under this Section;4        (6) rules concerning the intrastate transportation of 5    cannabis from a cultivation center, craft grower, infuser 6    organization, and transporting organization to a 7    dispensing organization;8        (7) standards concerning the testing, quality, 9    cultivation, and processing of cannabis; and10        (7.5) standards and rules for the investigation and 11    enforcement of unregulated and unlicensed sale of cannabis 12    and cannabis products; and 13        (8) any other matters under oversight by the 14    Department of Agriculture as are necessary for the fair, 15    impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of 16    this Act.17    (b-5) Notwithstanding any standards and rules developed 18under paragraph (7.5) of subsection (b) of this Section, the 19Department of Agriculture shall update through official 20guidance and publish publicly on its website the cannabinoids 21that it deems tetrahydrocannabinol or THC on or before January 221 and July 1 of each calendar year. 23    (c) The Department of Financial and Professional 24Regulation rules may address, but are not limited to, the 25following matters related to dispensing organizations, with 26the goal of protecting against diversion and theft, without   SB0020- 82 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1imposing an undue burden on the dispensing organizations:2        (1) oversight requirements for dispensing 3    organizations;4        (2) recordkeeping requirements for dispensing 5    organizations;6        (3) security requirements for dispensing 7    organizations, which shall include that each dispensing 8    organization location must be protected by a fully 9    operational security alarm system;10        (4) procedures for suspending or revoking the licenses 11    of dispensing organization agents that commit violations 12    of this Act or the rules adopted under this Act;13        (4.5) standards and rules for the investigation and 14    enforcement of unregulated and unlicensed sale of cannabis 15    and cannabis products; and 16        (5) any other matters under oversight by the 17    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation that 18    are necessary for the fair, impartial, stringent, and 19    comprehensive administration of this Act.20    (d) The Department of Revenue rules may address, but are 21not limited to, the following matters related to the payment 22of taxes by cannabis business establishments:23        (1) recording of sales;24        (2) documentation of taxable income and expenses;25        (3) transfer of funds for the payment of taxes; or26        (4) any other matter under the oversight of the   SB0020- 83 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    Department of Revenue.2    (e) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 3rules may address, but are not limited to, a loan program or 4grant program to assist Social Equity Applicants access the 5capital needed to start a cannabis business establishment. The 6names of recipients and the amounts of any moneys received 7through a loan program or grant program shall be a public 8record.9    (f) The Illinois State Police rules may address 10enforcement of its authority under this Act. The Illinois 11State Police shall not make rules that infringe on the 12exclusive authority of the Department of Financial and 13Professional Regulation or the Department of Agriculture over 14licensees under this Act.15    (g) The Department of Human Services shall develop and 16disseminate:17        (1) educational information about the health risks 18    associated with the use of cannabis; and19        (2) one or more public education campaigns in 20    coordination with local health departments and community 21    organizations, including one or more prevention campaigns 22    directed at children, adolescents, parents, and pregnant 23    or breastfeeding women, to inform them of the potential 24    health risks associated with intentional or unintentional 25    cannabis use. 26(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19;   SB0020- 84 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    (410 ILCS 705/60-10)3    Sec. 60-10. Tax imposed. 4    (a) Beginning September 1, 2019, a tax is imposed upon the 5privilege of cultivating cannabis at the rate of 7% of the 6gross receipts from the first sale of cannabis by a 7cultivator. The sale of any product that contains any amount 8of cannabis or any derivative thereof is subject to the tax 9under this Section on the full selling price of the product. 10The Department may determine the selling price of the cannabis 11when the seller and purchaser are affiliated persons, when the 12sale and purchase of cannabis is not an arm's length 13transaction, or when cannabis is transferred by a craft grower 14to the craft grower's dispensing organization or infuser or 15processing organization and a value is not established for the 16cannabis. The value determined by the Department shall be 17commensurate with the actual price received for products of 18like quality, character, and use in the area. If there are no 19sales of cannabis of like quality, character, and use in the 20same area, then the Department shall establish a reasonable 21value based on sales of products of like quality, character, 22and use in other areas of the State, taking into consideration 23any other relevant factors.24    (a-5) Beginning January 1, 2026, a tax is imposed upon the 25privilege of processing hemp-derived intoxicating products at   SB0020- 85 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1the rate of 7% of the gross receipts from the hemp 2manufacturer's sale of a hemp-derived intoxicating product to 3a craft grower or infuser. The sale of any hemp-derived 4intoxicating product as defined in the Hemp Consumer Products 5Act is subject to the tax under this Section on the full 6selling price of the product. The Department may determine the 7selling price of the hemp-derived intoxicating product when 8the seller and purchaser are affiliated persons or when the 9sale and purchase of a hemp-derived intoxicating product is 10not an arm's length transaction. The value determined by the 11Department shall be commensurate with the actual price 12received for products of like quality, character, and use in 13the area. If there are no sales of hemp-derived intoxicating 14products of like quality, character, and use in the same area, 15then the Department shall establish a reasonable value based 16on sales of products of like quality, character, and use in 17other areas of the State, taking into consideration any other 18relevant factors. 19    (b) The Cannabis Cultivation Privilege Tax imposed under 20this Article is solely the responsibility of the cultivator 21who makes the first sale and is not the responsibility of a 22subsequent purchaser, a dispensing organization, or an 23infuser. Persons subject to the tax imposed under this Article 24may, however, reimburse themselves for their tax liability 25hereunder by separately stating reimbursement for their tax 26liability as an additional charge.   SB0020- 86 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (c) The tax imposed under this Article shall be in 2addition to all other occupation, privilege, or excise taxes 3imposed by the State of Illinois or by any unit of local 4government.5(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.) 6    (410 ILCS 705/60-15)7    Sec. 60-15. Registration of cultivators. Every cultivator 8and craft grower subject to the tax under this Article shall 9apply to the Department of Revenue for a certificate of 10registration under this Article. All applications for 11registration under this Article shall be made by electronic 12means in the form and manner required by the Department. For 13that purpose, the provisions of Section 2a of the Retailers' 14Occupation Tax Act are incorporated into this Article to the 15extent not inconsistent with this Article. In addition, no 16certificate of registration shall be issued under this Article 17unless the applicant is licensed under this Act or is licensed 18as a hemp consumer products manufacturer under the Hemp 19Consumer Products Act.20(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.) 21    (410 ILCS 705/60-20)22    Sec. 60-20. Return and payment of cannabis cultivation 23privilege tax. Each person who is required to pay the tax 24imposed by this Article shall make a return to the Department   SB0020- 87 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1on or before the 20th day of each month for the preceding 2calendar month stating the following: 3        (1) the taxpayer's name;4        (2) the address of the taxpayer's principal place of 5    business and the address of the principal place of 6    business (if that is a different address) from which the 7    taxpayer is engaged in the business of cultivating 8    cannabis subject to tax under this Article;9        (3) the total amount of receipts received by the 10    taxpayer during the preceding calendar month from sales of 11    cannabis or hemp-derived intoxicating products subject to 12    tax under this Article by the taxpayer during the 13    preceding calendar month;14        (4) the total amount received by the taxpayer during 15    the preceding calendar month on charge and time sales of 16    cannabis subject to tax imposed under this Article by the 17    taxpayer before the month for which the return is filed;18        (5) deductions allowed by law;19        (6) gross receipts that were received by the taxpayer 20    during the preceding calendar month and upon the basis of 21    which the tax is imposed;22        (7) the amount of tax due;23        (8) the signature of the taxpayer; and24        (9) any other information as the Department may 25    reasonably require.26    All returns required to be filed and payments required to   SB0020- 88 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1be made under this Article shall be by electronic means. 2Taxpayers who demonstrate hardship in paying electronically 3may petition the Department to waive the electronic payment 4requirement. The Department may require a separate return for 5the tax under this Article or combine the return for the tax 6under this Article with the return for the tax under the 7Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act. If the 8return for the tax under this Article is combined with the 9return for tax under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 10Program Act, then the vendor's discount allowed under this 11Section and any cap on that discount shall apply to the 12combined return. The taxpayer making the return provided for 13in this Section shall also pay to the Department, in 14accordance with this Section, the amount of tax imposed by 15this Article, less a discount of 1.75%, but not to exceed 16$1,000 per return period, which is allowed to reimburse the 17taxpayer for the expenses incurred in keeping records, 18collecting tax, preparing and filing returns, remitting the 19tax, and supplying data to the Department upon request. No 20discount may be claimed by a taxpayer on returns not timely 21filed and for taxes not timely remitted. No discount may be 22claimed by a taxpayer for any return that is not filed 23electronically. No discount may be claimed by a taxpayer for 24any payment that is not made electronically, unless a waiver 25has been granted under this Section. Any amount that is 26required to be shown or reported on any return or other   SB0020- 89 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1document under this Article shall, if the amount is not a 2whole-dollar amount, be increased to the nearest whole-dollar 3amount if the fractional part of a dollar is $0.50 or more and 4decreased to the nearest whole-dollar amount if the fractional 5part of a dollar is less than $0.50. If a total amount of less 6than $1 is payable, refundable, or creditable, the amount 7shall be disregarded if it is less than $0.50 and shall be 8increased to $1 if it is $0.50 or more. Notwithstanding any 9other provision of this Article concerning the time within 10which a taxpayer may file a return, any such taxpayer who 11ceases to engage in the kind of business that makes the person 12responsible for filing returns under this Article shall file a 13final return under this Article with the Department within one 14month after discontinuing such business.15    Each taxpayer under this Article shall make estimated 16payments to the Department on or before the 7th, 15th, 22nd, 17and last day of the month during which tax liability to the 18Department is incurred. The payments shall be in an amount not 19less than the lower of either 22.5% of the taxpayer's actual 20tax liability for the month or 25% of the taxpayer's actual tax 21liability for the same calendar month of the preceding year. 22The amount of the quarter-monthly payments shall be credited 23against the final tax liability of the taxpayer's return for 24that month. If any quarter-monthly payment is not paid at the 25time or in the amount required by this Section, then the 26taxpayer shall be liable for penalties and interest on the   SB0020- 90 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1difference between the minimum amount due as a payment and the 2amount of the quarter-monthly payment actually and timely 3paid, except insofar as the taxpayer has previously made 4payments for that month to the Department in excess of the 5minimum payments previously due as provided in this Section. 6    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 7taxpayer's liabilities under this Article, as shown on an 8original monthly return, the Department shall, if requested by 9the taxpayer, issue to the taxpayer a credit memorandum no 10later than 30 days after the date of payment. The credit 11evidenced by the credit memorandum may be assigned by the 12taxpayer to a similar taxpayer under this Act, in accordance 13with reasonable rules to be prescribed by the Department. If 14no such request is made, the taxpayer may credit the excess 15payment against tax liability subsequently to be remitted to 16the Department under this Act, in accordance with reasonable 17rules prescribed by the Department. If the Department 18subsequently determines that all or any part of the credit 19taken was not actually due to the taxpayer, the taxpayer's 20discount shall be reduced, if necessary, to reflect the 21difference between the credit taken and that actually due, and 22that taxpayer shall be liable for penalties and interest on 23the difference.24    If a taxpayer fails to sign a return within 30 days after 25the proper notice and demand for signature by the Department 26is received by the taxpayer, the return shall be considered   SB0020- 91 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1valid and any amount shown to be due on the return shall be 2deemed assessed.3(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 4    Section 820. The Industrial Hemp Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 10, and 20 and by adding Section 30 as 6follows: 7    (505 ILCS 89/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.10    "Director" means the Director of Agriculture.11    "Hemp" or "industrial hemp" means the plant species 12Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the 13seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, 14isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing 15or not, with a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol 16concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight 17basis. "Hemp" or "industrial hemp" means the plant Cannabis 18sativa L. and any part of that plant, whether growing or not, 19with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more 20than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis and includes any 21intermediate or finished product made or derived from 22industrial hemp.23    "Hemp production plan" means a plan submitted by the 24Department to the Secretary of the United States Department of   SB0020- 92 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1Agriculture pursuant to the federal Agriculture Improvement 2Act of 2018, Public Law 115-334, and consistent with the 3Domestic Hemp Production Program pursuant to 7 CFR Part 990 4wherein the Department establishes its desire to have primary 5regulatory authority over the production of hemp. 6    "Industrial hemp processor" means any entity that 7processes or handles industrial hemp into a final product not 8intended for human or animal consumption that is registered 9with the Department. "Industrial hemp processor" includes, 10until the availability of a hemp consumer product manufacturer 11license under the Hemp Consumer Product Act, any entity that 12processes or handles industrial hemp.13    "Industrial hemp product" means any finished product made 14or derived from industrial hemp that is not intended for human 15or animal consumption by any means. "Industrial hemp product" 16does not include any edible, topical, or beverage product or 17any product that may be smoked or vaped. 18    "Land area" means a farm as defined in Section 1-60 of the 19Property Tax Code in this State or land or facilities under the 20control of an institution of higher education.21    "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, 22corporation, company, society, association, the State or any 23department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any other 24entity.25    "Process" means the conversion of raw industrial hemp 26plant material into a form that is presently legal to import   SB0020- 93 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1from outside the United States under federal law.2    "THC" means delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol.3(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 4    (505 ILCS 89/10)5    Sec. 10. Licenses and registration. 6    (a) No person shall cultivate industrial hemp in this 7State without a license issued by the Department. 8    (b) The application for a license shall include:9        (1) the name and address of the applicant;10        (2) the legal description of the land area, including 11    Global Positioning System coordinates, to be used to 12    cultivate industrial hemp; and13        (3) if federal law requires a research purpose for the 14    cultivation of industrial hemp, a description of one or 15    more research purposes planned for the cultivation of 16    industrial hemp which may include the study of the growth, 17    cultivation, or marketing of industrial hemp; however, the 18    research purpose requirement shall not be construed to 19    limit the commercial sale of industrial hemp.20    (b-5) A person shall not process industrial hemp in this 21State without registering with the Department as an industrial 22hemp processor on a form prescribed by the Department.23    (c) The Department may determine, by rule, the duration of 24a license or registration; application, registration, and 25license fees; and the requirements for license or registration   SB0020- 94 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1renewal.2(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 3    (505 ILCS 89/20)4    Sec. 20. Hemp products. Nothing in this Act shall alter 5the legality of industrial hemp or hemp products not intended 6for human or animal consumption by any means. The manufacture, 7sale, and advertisement of all hemp or hemp products that are 8intended for human or animal consumption by any means are 9regulated under the Hemp Consumer Products Act hemp or hemp 10products that are presently legal to possess or own.11(Source: P.A. 100-1091, eff. 8-26-18.) 12    (505 ILCS 89/30 new)13    Sec. 30. Industrial Hemp processing.14    (a) A person may not process industrial hemp in this State 15without registering with the Department on a form prescribed 16by the Department. 17    (b) The application shall include: 18        (1) the name and address of the applicant; and 19        (2) the address of the location at which hemp will be 20    processed.21        (3) A certification that the hemp processor shall not 22    produce, process or manufacture any product derived from 23    hemp intended for human or animal consumption or produce, 24    process, or manufacture any product that will be provided,   SB0020- 95 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    transferred or sold to a different entity that will create 2    products intended for human or animal consumption.3        (4) A description of the processes that the industrial 4    hemp processor will be performing. 5    (c) The Department may determine, by rule, the duration of 6a hemp processor registration, application, and registration 7fees, and the requirements for registration renewal. 8    (d) An industrial hemp processor shall be prohibited from 9extracting, concentrating, or synthesizing hemp 10phytocannabinoids. 11    (e) Beginning January 1, 2026, all active hemp processing 12registrations that process or manufacture products derived 13from hemp intended for human or animal consumption shall be 14regulated under the Hemp Consumer Products Act. Hemp 15processing shall not be regulated under the Industrial Hemp 16Act. By January 1, 2026, the Department of Agriculture shall 17create a process to provide each active hemp processor 18registrant that processes or produces products intended for 19human or animal consumption by any means with a Hemp Consumer 20Products Act hemp consumer product manufacturer license. 21    (f) The Department may revoke the registration of any 22industrial hemp processor that processes or manufactures 23products derived from hemp intended for human or animal 24consumption and fails to register as a hemp consumer product 25manufacturer under the Hemp Consumer Products Act by March 1, 262026. All industrial hemp processors that are not processing   SB0020- 96 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1or manufacturing products derived from hemp intended for human 2or animal consumption shall provide the Department with a 3certification that they are not processing or manufacturing 4products intended for human or animal consumption by March 1, 52026. The Department may revoke the registration of any 6industrial hemp processor that fails to provide the Department 7with a certification by March 1, 2026. 8    (g) The Department may inspect industrial hemp processors 9to ensure compliance with this Act and administrative rules.10    (h) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 11of the 104th General Assembly, cannabis business 12establishments licensed under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 13Act are not required to obtain a hemp processor registration 14or hemp consumer product manufacturer license.  15    Section 825. The Cannabis Control Act is amended by 16changing Sections 3, 4, 5, and 5.1 as follows: 17    (720 ILCS 550/3)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 703)18    Sec. 3. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 19requires: 20    (a) "Cannabis" includes marihuana, hashish and other 21substances which are identified as including any parts of the 22plant Cannabis Sativa, whether growing or not; the seeds 23thereof, the resin extracted from any part of such plant; and 24any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or   SB0020- 97 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1preparation of such plant, its seeds, or resin, including 2tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other cannabinol 3derivatives, including its naturally occurring or 4synthetically produced ingredients, whether produced directly 5or indirectly by extraction, or independently by means of 6chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and 7chemical synthesis, including, but not limited to, any 8structural, optical, or geometric isomers of THC, or any 9chemical compound that mimics THC; but shall not include the 10mature stalks of such plant, fiber produced from such stalks, 11oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant, any other 12compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 13preparation of such mature stalks (except the resin extracted 14therefrom), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of such 15plant which is incapable of germination. 16    (b) "Casual delivery" means the delivery of not more than 1710 grams of any substance containing cannabis without 18consideration.19    (c) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Human 20Services (as successor to the Department of Alcoholism and 21Substance Abuse) or its successor agency.22    (d) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive 23or attempted transfer of possession of cannabis, with or 24without consideration, whether or not there is an agency 25relationship.26    (e) (Blank).  SB0020- 98 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    (f) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 2Police or his designated agent.3    (g) "Local authorities" means a duly organized State, 4county, or municipal peace unit or police force.5    (h) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, 6propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of 7cannabis, either directly or indirectly, by extraction from 8substances of natural origin, or independently by means of 9chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and 10chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging 11of cannabis or labeling of its container, except that this 12term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, 13or labeling of cannabis as an incident to lawful research, 14teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.15    (i) "Person" means any individual, corporation, government 16or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, 17trust, partnership or association, or any other entity.18    (j) "Produce" or "production" means planting, cultivating, 19tending or harvesting.20    (k) "State" includes the State of Illinois and any state, 21district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, 22and any area subject to the legal authority of the United 23States of America.24    (l) "Subsequent offense" means an offense under this Act, 25the offender of which, prior to his conviction of the offense, 26has at any time been convicted under this Act or under any laws   SB0020- 99 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1of the United States or of any state relating to cannabis, or 2any controlled substance as defined in the Illinois Controlled 3Substances Act.4    (m) "Tetrahydrocannabinol" or "THC" means any naturally 5occurring or synthetic tetrahydrocannabinol, including its 6salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of 7such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within 8the specific chemical designation and any preparation, 9mixture, or substance containing, or mixed or infused with, 10any detectable amount of tetrahydrocannabinol or 11tetrahydrocannabolic acid, including, but not limited to, 12delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, 13delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabolic acid, 14tetrahydrocannabipherol, or hexahydrocannabinol, however 15derived, or any other substance determined to have similar 16intoxicating effects on the mind or body by the Department of 17Agriculture. As used in this definition, "isomer" means the 18optical, position, and geometric isomers. 19(Source: P.A. 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 20    (720 ILCS 550/4)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 704)21    Sec. 4. Except as otherwise provided in the Cannabis 22Regulation and Tax Act, Hemp Consumer Products Act, and the 23Industrial Hemp Act, it is unlawful for any person knowingly 24to possess cannabis.25    Any person who violates this Section with respect to:  SB0020- 100 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1        (a) not more than 10 grams of any substance containing 2    cannabis is guilty of a civil law violation punishable by 3    a minimum fine of $100 and a maximum fine of $200. The 4    proceeds of the fine shall be payable to the clerk of the 5    circuit court. Within 30 days after the deposit of the 6    fine, the clerk shall distribute the proceeds of the fine 7    as follows:8            (1) $10 of the fine to the circuit clerk and $10 of 9        the fine to the law enforcement agency that issued the 10        citation; the proceeds of each $10 fine distributed to 11        the circuit clerk and each $10 fine distributed to the 12        law enforcement agency that issued the citation for 13        the violation shall be used to defer the cost of 14        automatic expungements under paragraph (2.5) of 15        subsection (a) of Section 5.2 of the Criminal 16        Identification Act;17            (2) $15 to the county to fund drug addiction 18        services;19            (3) $10 to the Office of the State's Attorneys 20        Appellate Prosecutor for use in training programs;21            (4) $10 to the State's Attorney; and22            (5) any remainder of the fine to the law 23        enforcement agency that issued the citation for the 24        violation.25        With respect to funds designated for the Illinois 26    State Police, the moneys shall be remitted by the circuit   SB0020- 101 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    court clerk to the Illinois State Police within one month 2    after receipt for deposit into the State Police Operations 3    Assistance Fund. With respect to funds designated for the 4    Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Natural 5    Resources shall deposit the moneys into the Conservation 6    Police Operations Assistance Fund;7        (b) more than 10 grams but not more than 30 grams of 8    any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class B 9    misdemeanor;10        (c) more than 30 grams but not more than 100 grams of 11    any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class A 12    misdemeanor; provided, that if any offense under this 13    subsection (c) is a subsequent offense, the offender shall 14    be guilty of a Class 4 felony;15        (d) more than 100 grams but not more than 500 grams of 16    any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class 4 17    felony; provided that if any offense under this subsection 18    (d) is a subsequent offense, the offender shall be guilty 19    of a Class 3 felony;20        (e) more than 500 grams but not more than 2,000 grams 21    of any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class 22    3 felony;23        (f) more than 2,000 grams but not more than 5,000 24    grams of any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a 25    Class 2 felony;26        (g) more than 5,000 grams of any substance containing   SB0020- 102 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    cannabis is guilty of a Class 1 felony.2    Fines and assessments, such as fees or administrative 3costs, authorized under this Section shall not be ordered or 4imposed against a minor subject to Article III, IV, or V of the 5Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or a minor under the age of 18 6transferred to adult court or excluded from juvenile court 7jurisdiction under Article V of the Juvenile Court Act of 81987, or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian. 9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23.) 10    (720 ILCS 550/5)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 705)11    Sec. 5. Except as otherwise provided in the Cannabis 12Regulation and Tax Act, Hemp Consumer Products Act, and the 13Industrial Hemp Act, it is unlawful for any person knowingly 14to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver, or 15manufacture, cannabis. Any person who violates this Section 16with respect to:17        (a) not more than 2.5 grams of any substance 18    containing cannabis is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor;19        (b) more than 2.5 grams but not more than 10 grams of 20    any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class A 21    misdemeanor;22        (c) more than 10 grams but not more than 30 grams of 23    any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class 4 24    felony;25        (d) more than 30 grams but not more than 500 grams of   SB0020- 103 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1    any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class 3 2    felony for which a fine not to exceed $50,000 may be 3    imposed;4        (e) more than 500 grams but not more than 2,000 grams 5    of any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a Class 6    2 felony for which a fine not to exceed $100,000 may be 7    imposed;8        (f) more than 2,000 grams but not more than 5,000 9    grams of any substance containing cannabis is guilty of a 10    Class 1 felony for which a fine not to exceed $150,000 may 11    be imposed;12        (g) more than 5,000 grams of any substance containing 13    cannabis is guilty of a Class X felony for which a fine not 14    to exceed $200,000 may be imposed.15(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 16    (720 ILCS 550/5.1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 705.1)17    Sec. 5.1. Cannabis trafficking. 18    (a) Except for purposes authorized by this Act, the 19Industrial Hemp Act, the Hemp Consumer Products Act, or the 20Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, any person who knowingly 21brings or causes to be brought into this State for the purpose 22of manufacture or delivery or with the intent to manufacture 23or deliver 2,500 grams or more of cannabis in this State or any 24other state or country is guilty of cannabis trafficking.25    (b) A person convicted of cannabis trafficking shall be   SB0020- 104 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1sentenced to a term of imprisonment not less than twice the 2minimum term and fined an amount as authorized by subsection 3(f) or (g) of Section 5 of this Act, based upon the amount of 4cannabis brought or caused to be brought into this State, and 5not more than twice the maximum term of imprisonment and fined 6twice the amount as authorized by subsection (f) or (g) of 7Section 5 of this Act, based upon the amount of cannabis 8brought or caused to be brought into this State.9(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 10    Section 830. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 11Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2Z as follows: 12    (815 ILCS 505/2Z)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z)13    Sec. 2Z. Violations of other Acts. Any person who 14knowingly violates the Automotive Repair Act, the Automotive 15Collision Repair Act, the Home Repair and Remodeling Act, the 16Dance Studio Act, the Physical Fitness Services Act, the 17Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act, the Illinois Union 18Label Act, the Installment Sales Contract Act, the Job 19Referral and Job Listing Services Consumer Protection Act, the 20Travel Promotion Consumer Protection Act, the Credit Services 21Organizations Act, the Automatic Telephone Dialers Act, the 22Pay-Per-Call Services Consumer Protection Act, the Telephone 23Solicitations Act, the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, 24the Cemetery Oversight Act, the Cemetery Care Act, the Safe   SB0020- 105 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1and Hygienic Bed Act, the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 2Act, the High Risk Home Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, 3the Predatory Loan Prevention Act, the Mortgage Rescue Fraud 4Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Tax 5Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Use 6Tax Act, the Electronic Mail Act, the Internet Caller 7Identification Act, paragraph (6) of subsection (k) of Section 86-305 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, Section 11-1431, 18d-115, 918d-120, 18d-125, 18d-135, 18d-150, or 18d-153 of the Illinois 10Vehicle Code, Article 3 of the Residential Real Property 11Disclosure Act, the Automatic Contract Renewal Act, the 12Reverse Mortgage Act, Section 25 of the Youth Mental Health 13Protection Act, the Personal Information Protection Act, or 14the Student Online Personal Protection Act, or subsection (a) 15of Section 15-155 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act 16commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.17(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17; 100-416, eff. 1-1-18; 18100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 19    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.  SB0020- 106 -LRB104 07738 BDA 17783 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    30 ILCS 500/1-105    30 ILCS 105/6z-1126    410 ILCS 705/1-107    410 ILCS 705/15-1558    410 ILCS 705/20-60 new9    410 ILCS 705/30-3010    410 ILCS 705/35-2511    410 ILCS 705/55-5.5 new12    410 ILCS 705/55-3513    410 ILCS 705/60-1014    410 ILCS 705/60-1515    410 ILCS 705/60-2016    505 ILCS 89/517    505 ILCS 89/1018    505 ILCS 89/2019    505 ILCS 89/30 new20    720 ILCS 550/3from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 70321    720 ILCS 550/4from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 70422    720 ILCS 550/5from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 70523    720 ILCS 550/5.1from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 705.124    815 ILCS 505/2Zfrom Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z